Connecticut, session 2026, SB00298.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
following agencies in section 1 of public act 25-168 are reduced by the
following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
GENERAL FUND 2025-2026
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
Temporary Family Assistance - TANF 3,400,000
TOTAL – GENERAL FUND 3,400,000
Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) The sum of $1,700,000 is appropriated to
the Labor Department, for Personal Services, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, for the purpose of (1) offsetting declining federal funds
that support unemployment compensation program personnel costs,
and (2) supporting the integration of information technology solutions
in such program to improve service for individuals applying for
benefits.

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) The sum of $1,700,000 is appropriated to
the Department of Education, for Adult Education, from the General
Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
Sec. 4. (Effective from passage) The unexpended balance of funds
appropriated to the Department of Education, for Adult Education, in
section 3 of this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be made available for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, for the same purpose.
Sec. 5. (Effective from passage) (a) The sum of $174,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168 to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
shall be transferred to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Other Expenses, and made available for a grant-in-aid
to New London VFW.
(b) The Department of Education and the Department of Economic
and Community Development shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding to effectuate the purpose of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 6. (Effective from passage) The sum of $70,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168 to the Judicial Department,
for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall be
made available for a grant to the Village Initiative Project.
Sec. 7. (Effective from passage) From the amount appropriated in
section 1 of public act 25-168 to the Office of Policy and Management,
for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, not more
than $2,500,000 shall be made available for outdoor recreation in the city
of Hartford.
Sec. 8. Section 140 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-1 2 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(a) As used in this section, (1) "neuromodulation" means the
alteration of nerve activity through targeted delivery of a stimulus,
including, but not limited to, electrical stimulation or chemical agents,
to specific neurological sites in the body, and (2) "hospital" has the same
meaning as provided in section 19a-490 of the general statutes.
(b) The University of Connecticut Health Center shall establish a
Center of Excellence for Neuromodulation Treatments. The health
center may collaborate with a hospital in the state to conduct
neuromodulation research and provide neuromodulation treatments to
[patients] disabled veterans at the Center of Excellence for
Neuromodulation Treatments.
Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) The sum of $1,500,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168 to the Department of Social
Services, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
and the sum of $1,000,000 of such amount appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 20, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years for
grants to school districts in Newington, Wethersfield, Cromwell, Rocky
Hill and Middletown for the support or establishment of high acuity,
school-based mental health programming. For purposes of this section,
(1) "high acuity, school-based mental health programming" means
programming offered by a qualified provider that includes (A) clinical
care to prevent the need for out-of-district placements for students with
intensive behavioral health challenges or return such students from
such placements to their home districts, (B) in-person therapeutic
services provided in a designated school space by mental health
clinicians who have attained at least a master's degree in a related
mental health education program, and (C) therapeutic support
capabilities, including, but not limited to, regular clinical supervision,
quality and risk management data analysis and monitoring and specific
interventions meant to reduce chronic student absenteeism; and (2)
"qualified provider" means a provider of high acuity, school-based
Public Act No. 26-1 3 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
mental health programming that is designated as an outpatient
psychiatric clinic for children by the Department of Children and
Families and certified or contracted to bill Medicaid or commercial
insurance in the state.
Sec. 10. Section 122 of public act 21-111 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Windham may use the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per
cent for the renovation project at Windham High School (Project
Number 163-0079 RNV). [, provided (1) the school district for the town
of Windham is an educational reform district, as defined in section 10-
262u of the general statutes, on the effective date of this section, and (2)
the date of beginning of construction, as defined in section 10-282 of the
general statutes, is not later than one year after the effective date of this
section.]
Sec. 11. (Effective from passage) The sum of $330,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168 to the Department of
Economic and Community Development, for Other Expenses, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall be made available in said fiscal
year to provide a grant to Our Piece of the Pie.
Sec. 12. Subsection (UU) of section 36 of public act 25-168 is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(UU) The sum of $750,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168 to the Department of Education, for Other
Expenses, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
Public Act No. 26-1 4 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
shall be made available in each of said fiscal years for a teacher residency
program that is operated by Capitol Region Education Council.
Sec. 13. (Effective from passage) The sum of $200,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168 to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
and made available to provide a grant to Free Agent Now, shall not
lapse on June 30, 2026, and such funds shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the same
purpose.
Sec. 14. Section 169 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning ineligible costs, [and section 10-286g of the general statutes
concerning the waiver of audit deficiencies,] the town of Fairfield shall
be eligible to receive reimbursement for certain ineligible costs [and
audit deficiencies] associated with the extension and alteration project
at Mill Hill Elementary School (Project Number [093-0367] 051-0149 EA),
provided such reimbursement for such ineligible costs [and audit
deficiencies do] does not exceed six hundred thousand dollars.
Sec. 15. Section 156 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2024, for any school building project that was previously authorized and
that has changed substantially in scope or cost and is seeking
Public Act No. 26-1 5 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
reauthorization, the new construction project at the [New] Roxbury
Elementary School (Project Number 23DASY135281N0623) in the town
of Stamford with costs not to exceed one hundred thirty million dollars
shall be included in subdivision (2) of section 141 of [this act] public act
25-174 and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment
from the state, provided the town of Stamford meets all other provisions
of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to
said chapter.
Sec. 16. Section 174 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, as amended by [this act] public act 25-174, or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
reimbursement percentage that a local board of education may be
eligible to receive for a school building project, the town of New London
may use the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per cent for a cost
increase, not to exceed ten million dollars, approved by the
Commissioner of Administrative Services on or before July 1, 2025, for
the new construction project at [East End Elementary] New London
High School (Project Number 095-0090 N).
Sec. 17. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning ineligible costs, the town of
Cheshire shall be eligible to receive reimbursement under chapter 173
of the general statutes for certain ineligible costs associated with any
existing or future energy or infrastructure improvement projects,
including, but not limited to, photovoltaic, building management
Public Act No. 26-1 6 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
systems, energy conservation, heating, ventilation and air conditioning
systems and roof replacement projects, at any elementary, middle or
high school in the town that are financed through a tax-exempt lease
purchase agreement.
Sec. 18. Section 149 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2024, the school building project at Middlefield Memorial School in
Regional District 13 with costs not to exceed seventy-six million one
hundred thirty thousand dollars shall be included in subdivision (1) of
section 141 of [this act] public act 25-174 and shall subsequently be
considered for a grant commitment from the state, provided Regional
District 13 files an application for such school building project prior to
October 1, 2025, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring that the description of a project type for a school building
project be made at the time of application for a school building project
grant and the provisions of subdivision (18) of section 10-282 of the
general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said section 10-282 concerning the definition of renovation, Regional
District 13 may change the description of the school building project at
Middlefield Memorial School to a renovation project and subsequently
Public Act No. 26-1 7 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
qualify as a renovation, as defined in subdivision (18) of said section 10-
282.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection
(e) of section 10-285a of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to
January 1, 2025, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said section increasing the reimbursement percentage for a school
building project that includes the expansion of an existing building to
include space for an early childhood care and education program by
fifteen percentage points for the portion of the building used primarily
for such program, the reimbursement percentage for the school building
project at Middlefield Memorial School in Regional District 13 shall be
increased by fifteen percentage points for the entire school building
project.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning ineligible costs, Regional District 13 shall be eligible to
receive reimbursement for certain ineligible costs relating to the Phase 1
swing space used for students while the school building project at
Middlefield Memorial School was being completed, provided such
ineligible costs do not exceed two million dollars.
Sec. 19. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-284 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
requiring that a town or regional school district begin construction on a
project not later than two years after the effective date of the section of
the General Assembly authorizing the Commissioner of Administrative
Services to enter into grant commitments for such project, the town of
Hartford shall have until June 30, 2028, to begin construction on the (1)
alteration project at Expeditionary Learning Academy at Moylan School
Public Act No. 26-1 8 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(Project Number 23DASY064319A0623), (2) alteration project at
Parkville Community School (Project Number 23DASY064320A0623),
(3) alteration project at McDonough Middle School (Project Number
23DASY064321A0623), (4) renovation project at Montessori Magnet at
Batchelder (Project Number 24DASY064322RNV0624), (5) renovation
project at S.A.N.D. Elementary School (Project Number
24DASY064323RNV0624), and (6) renovation project at Maria C. Colon
Sanchez Elementary School (Project Number 24DASY064324RNV0624).
Sec. 20. Section 10-5 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (g) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (g) The Department of Education shall establish criteria by
which a local or regional board of education, or the governing board of
any other school that awards diplomas, may affix the Connecticut State
Seal of Civics Education and Engagement on a diploma awarded to a
student who has achieved a high level of proficiency in civics education
and engagement. Such criteria shall include, but need not be limited to,
(1) successful completion of history or social science courses for at least
two school years, one of which shall be a course on the United States
government or civics, (2) participation in at least one civic engagement
project, such as community service, participation in student
government, internship with an elected official or involvement in a civic
organization, and (3) demonstrated proficiency in civics knowledge
through a standardized assessment, portfolio of work that includes
essays, projects or presentations related to civics or other mastery-based
assessment or process.
Sec. 21. Section 10-221a of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (m) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (m) Commencing with classes graduating in 2027, and for
each graduating class thereafter, a local or regional board of education
may affix the Connecticut State Seal of Civics Education and
Public Act No. 26-1 9 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Engagement, as described in subsection (g) of section 10-5, as amended
by this act, to a diploma awarded to a student who has achieved a high
level of proficiency in civics education and engagement. The local or
regional board of education shall include on such student's transcript a
designation that the student received the Connecticut State Seal of
Civics Education and Engagement.
Sec. 22. Subsection (c) of section 10-10a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) The state-wide public school information system shall:
(1) Track and report data relating to student, teacher and school and
district performance growth and make such information available to
local and regional boards of education for use in evaluating educational
performance and growth of teachers and students enrolled in public
schools in the state. Such information shall be collected or calculated
based on information received from local and regional boards of
education and other relevant sources. Such information shall include,
but not be limited to:
(A) In addition to performance on state-wide mastery examinations
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, data relating to students shall
include, but not be limited to, (i) the primary language spoken at the
home of a student, (ii) student transcripts, (iii) student attendance and
student mobility, (iv) reliable, valid assessments of a student's readiness
to enter public school at the kindergarten level, [and] (v) data collected,
if any, from the preschool experience survey, described in section 10-
515, and (vi) data required pursuant to section 10-17m concerning the
academic progress of students in bilingual education programs;
(B) Data relating to teachers shall include, but not be limited to, (i)
teacher credentials, such as master's degrees, teacher preparation
Public Act No. 26-1 10 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
programs completed and certification levels and endorsement areas, (ii)
teacher assessments, such as whether a teacher is deemed highly
qualified pursuant to the No Child Left Behind Act, P.L. 107-110, or
deemed to meet such other designations as may be established by
federal law or regulations for the purposes of tracking the equitable
distribution of instructional staff, (iii) the presence of substitute teachers
in a teacher's classroom, (iv) class size, (v) numbers relating to
absenteeism in a teacher's classroom, and (vi) the presence of a teacher's
aide. The department shall assign a unique teacher identifier to each
teacher prior to collecting such data in the public school information
system;
(C) Data relating to schools and districts shall include, but not be
limited to, (i) school population, (ii) annual student graduation rates,
(iii) annual teacher retention rates, (iv) school disciplinary records, such
as data relating to suspensions, expulsions and other disciplinary
actions, (v) the percentage of students whose primary language is not
English, (vi) the number of and professional credentials of support
personnel, (vii) information relating to instructional technology, such as
access to computers, [and] (viii) disaggregated measures of school-
based arrests pursuant to section 10-233n, and (ix) the measures and
data required pursuant to section 10-17g for the evaluation of bilingual
education programs.
(2) Collect data relating to student enrollment in and graduation from
institutions of higher education for any student who had been assigned
a unique student identifier pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
provided such data is available.
(3) Develop means for access to and data sharing with the data
systems of public institutions of higher education in the state.
Sec. 23. Subsection (a) of section 10-17o of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
Public Act No. 26-1 11 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
2026):
(a) The State Board of Education shall draft a written bill of rights for
parents or guardians of students who are multilingual learners to
guarantee that the rights of such parents and students are adequately
safeguarded and protected in the provision of bilingual education under
chapter 164. Such bill of rights shall include, but need not be limited to,
the following declarations:
(1) The right of a multilingual learner student to attend a public
school in the state regardless of such student's immigration status or the
immigration status of such student's parent or guardian;
(2) The right of a parent or guardian of a multilingual learner student
to enroll such student in a public school without being required to
submit immigration documentation, including, but not limited to, a
Social Security number, visa documentation or proof of citizenship;
(3) The right of a multilingual learner student to have translation
services provided (A) by an interpreter who is present in person or
available by telephone or through an online technology platform, or (B)
through an Internet web site or other electronic application approved
by the State Board of Education, during critical interactions with
teachers and administrators, including, but not limited to, parent-
teacher conferences, meetings with administrators of the school in
which such student is attending, and at properly noticed regular or
special meetings of the board of education or scheduled meetings with
a member or members of the board of education responsible for
educating such student, in accordance with section 10-218b;
(4) The right of a multilingual learner student to participate in a
program of bilingual education offered by the local or regional board of
education when there are twenty or more eligible students classified as
dominant in a language, other than English, as such student, in
Public Act No. 26-1 12 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
accordance with the provisions of section 10-17f;
(5) The right of a parent or guardian of a multilingual learner student
to receive written notice, in both English and the dominant language of
such parent or guardian, that such student is eligible to participate in a
program of bilingual education or English as a new language program
offered by the local or regional board of education;
(6) The right of a multilingual learner student and the parent or
guardian of such student to receive a high-quality orientation session,
in the dominant language of such student and parent or guardian, from
the local or regional board of education that provides information
relating to state standards, tests and expectations at the school for
multilingual learner students, as well as the goals and requirements for
programs of bilingual education and English as a new language, prior
to participation in such program of bilingual education or English as a
new language;
(7) The right of the parent or guardian of a multilingual learner
student to receive information about the progress of such student's
English language development and acquisition;
(8) The right of a multilingual learner student and the parent or
guardian of such student to meet with school personnel to discuss such
student's English language development and acquisition;
(9) The right of a multilingual learner student to be placed in a
program of bilingual education or English as a new language, if offered
by the local or regional board of education;
(10) The right of a multilingual learner student to have equal access
to all grade-level school programming;
(11) The right of a multilingual learner student to have equal access
to all core grade-level subject matter;
Public Act No. 26-1 13 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(12) The right of a multilingual learner student to receive annual
language proficiency testing;
(13) The right of a multilingual learner student to receive support
services aligned with any intervention plan that the school or school
district provides to all students;
(14) The right of a multilingual learner student to be continuously
and annually enrolled in a program of bilingual education or English as
a new language while such student remains an eligible student, as
defined in section 10-17e; [and]
(15) The right of a parent or guardian of a multilingual learner
student to contact the Department of Education with any questions or
concerns regarding such student's right to receive multilingual learner
services or accommodations available to such student or parent or
guardian, including information regarding any recourse for failure of
the board of education to provide or ensure such services or
accommodations; and
(16) The right of a multilingual learner student and a parent or
guardian of a multilingual learner student to access publicly available
data related to the academic progress of students in bilingual education
programs and the quality of bilingual education programs on the state-
wide public school information system implemented pursuant to
section 10-10a, as amended by this act.
Sec. 24. Subsection (d) of section 10-16b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) The State Board of Education shall make available curriculum
materials and such other materials as may assist local and regional
boards of education in developing instructional programs pursuant to
this section. The State Board of Education, within available
Public Act No. 26-1 14 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
appropriations and utilizing available resource materials, shall assist
and encourage local and regional boards of education to include: (1)
Holocaust and genocide education and awareness; (2) the historical
events surrounding the Great Famine in Ireland; (3) African-American
and black studies; (4) Puerto Rican and Latino studies; (5) Native
American studies; (6) Asian American and Pacific Islander studies; (7)
personal financial management, including, but not limited to, financial
literacy as developed in the plan provided under section 10-16pp; (8)
training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of automatic
external defibrillators; (9) labor history and law, including organized
labor, the collective bargaining process, existing legal protections in the
workplace, the history and economics of free market capitalism and
entrepreneurialism, and the role of labor and capitalism in the
development of the American and world economies; (10) climate change
consistent with the Next Generation Science Standards; (11) topics
approved by the state board upon the request of local or regional boards
of education as part of the program of instruction offered pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section; [and] (12) instruction relating to the Safe
Haven Act, sections 17a-57 to 17a-61, inclusive; and (13) Islamic and
Arab studies. The Department of Energy and Environmental Protection
shall be available to each local and regional board of education for the
development of curriculum on climate change as described in this
subsection.
Sec. 25. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
working group to address antisemitism in public schools. The working
group shall develop guidance and resources to address issues relating
to antisemitism that affect students, families, educators and school
personnel. Such guidance and resources may include, but need not be
limited to, (1) suggested amendments to school district policies to
ensure that all students, educators and school personnel feel safe inside
and outside of the school setting, (2) recommended training relating to
antisemitism for educators and administrators, and (3) guidance in the
Public Act No. 26-1 15 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
creation or provision of curriculum materials and resources relating to
antisemitism and Jewish heritage and Holocaust and genocide
education and awareness, pursuant to the provisions of section 10-18f
of the general statutes.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom shall be a school administrator with expertise and
knowledge in developing and implementing curricula in public schools
in the state, and one of whom shall be a representative of the Jewish
Federation Association of Connecticut;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom shall have knowledge and national and local expertise and
experience in developing innovative and collaborative resources to
address antisemitism in elementary and secondary schools, and one of
whom shall be a representative of the Jewish Federation Association of
Connecticut;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a teacher with professional knowledge
and proven experience in addressing and combatting antisemitism in a
public school in the state;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who shall
have experience in teaching and school administration and expertise in
addressing and combatting antisemitism and teaching Jewish heritage;
(5) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be a current or former faculty
member of an institution of higher education with expertise in
curriculum development and knowledge and proven experience in
addressing antisemitism and teaching Jewish heritage, and one of
whom shall have professional experience addressing antisemitism in
Public Act No. 26-1 16 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the state;
(6) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, one of whom
shall be a leader at an institution of higher education in the state with
knowledge and expertise in program development addressing
antisemitism curriculum, and one of whom shall have professional
experience addressing antisemitism in the state;
(7) One appointed by the Governor, who shall be a representative
from a national organization with expertise in the study of global
antisemitism and an interdisciplinary study of antisemitism;
(8) The executive director of the Connecticut Association of Boards of
Education, or the executive director's designee;
(9) The executive director of the Connecticut Association of Public
School Superintendents, or the executive director's designee;
(10) The president of the Connecticut Education Association, or the
president's designee; and
(11) The Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee.
(c) All initial appointments to the working group shall be made not
later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority.
(d) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president
pro tempore of the Senate shall each select a cochairperson of the
working group from among the members of the working group. Such
cochairpersons shall jointly schedule the first meeting of the working
group, which shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective
date of this section.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education
Public Act No. 26-1 17 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit the
guidance and resources developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section and any recommendations for legislation, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes.
Sec. 26. Section 10-15c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The public schools shall be open to all children five years of age
and over who reach age five on or before the first day of September of
any school year, and each such child shall have, and shall be so advised
by the appropriate school authorities, an equal opportunity to
participate in the activities, programs and courses of study offered in
such public schools, at such time as the child becomes eligible to
participate in such activities, programs and courses of study, without
discrimination on account of race, as defined in section 46a-51, color,
sex, gender identity or expression, religion, national origin, sexual
orientation or disability; provided a child who has not reached the age
of five on or before the first day of September of the school year may be
admitted if the local or regional board of education adopts an early
admission policy that permits such child to be admitted (1) upon a
written request by the parent or guardian of such child to the principal
of the school in which such child would be enrolled, and (2) following
an assessment of such child, conducted by such principal and an
appropriate certified staff member of the school, to ensure that
admitting such child is developmentally appropriate.
(b) Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to amend
other provisions of the general statutes with respect to curricula,
facilities or extracurricular activities.
Public Act No. 26-1 18 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 27. Section 10-15c of the general statutes, as amended by section
26 of this act, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2027):
(a) The public schools shall be open to all children five years of age
and over who reach age five on or before the first day of September of
any school year, and each such child shall have, and shall be so advised
by the appropriate school authorities, an equal opportunity to
participate in the activities, programs and courses of study offered in
such public schools, at such time as the child becomes eligible to
participate in such activities, programs and courses of study, without
discrimination on account of race, as defined in section 46a-51, color,
sex, gender identity or expression, religion, national origin, sexual
orientation or disability. [; provided a child who has not reached the age
of five on or before the first day of September of the school year may be
admitted if the local or regional board of education adopts an early
admission policy that permits such child to be admitted (1) upon a
written request by the parent or guardian of such child to the principal
of the school in which such child would be enrolled, and (2) following
an assessment of such child, conducted by such principal and an
appropriate certified staff member of the school, to ensure that
admitting such child is developmentally appropriate.]
(b) Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to amend
other provisions of the general statutes with respect to curricula,
facilities or extracurricular activities.
Sec. 28. Section 10-226b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Whenever the State Board of Education finds that racial imbalance
exists in a public school, it shall notify in writing the board of education
having jurisdiction over said school that such finding has been made,
except the State Board of Education shall not notify a board of education
Public Act No. 26-1 19 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
of such finding until July 1, [2025] 2030.
(b) As used in sections 10-226a to 10-226e, inclusive, "racial
imbalance" means a condition wherein the proportion of pupils of racial
minorities in all of the grades of a public school of the secondary level
or below taken together substantially exceeds or falls substantially short
of the proportion of such public school pupils in all of the same grades
of the school district in which said school is situated taken together.
Sec. 29. Section 10-226c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Any board of education receiving notification of the existence of
racial imbalance as specified in section 10-226b, as amended by this act,
shall forthwith prepare a plan to correct such imbalance and file a copy
of said plan with the State Board of Education, except such board of
education shall not be required to prepare and file said plan until July
1, [2025] 2030. Said plan may be limited to addressing the imbalance
existing at any school and need not result in a district-wide plan or
district-wide pupil reassignment. A school district may request an
extension of time in cases in which the number of students causing said
imbalance is fewer than five students at a school.
(b) Any plan submitted by the board of education of any town under
sections 10-226a to 10-226e, inclusive, shall include any proposed
changes in existing school attendance districts, the location of proposed
school building sites as related to the problem, any proposed additions
to existing school buildings and all other means proposed for the
correction of said racial imbalance. The plan shall include projections of
the expected racial composition of all public schools in the district. The
plan may include provision for cooperation with other school districts
to assist in the correction of racial imbalance.
Sec. 30. Section 10-226d of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-1 20 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Upon receipt of any plan required under the provisions of subsection
(b) of section 10-226c, as amended by this act, the State Board of
Education shall review said plan. If it determines that the plan is
satisfactory, it shall approve the plan and shall provide to the board of
education such assistance and services as may be available. The board
of education shall submit annual reports on the implementation of the
approved plan, as the State Board of Education may require. The State
Board of Education shall not take action on any plan received on or after
July 1, 2024, until July 1, [2025] 2030.
Sec. 31. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) For the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, during the preparation of
the itemized estimate of the cost of maintenance of public schools for the
ensuing year pursuant to section 10-222 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, the superintendent of schools shall provide the
members of the local board of education the original amount and actual
amount of each line item for the two fiscal years immediately preceding
the fiscal year in which such itemized estimate is being prepared and
the original amount and current amount of each line item for the fiscal
year in which such itemized estimate is being prepared. As used in this
section, "itemized estimate" means an estimate in which broad
budgetary categories including, but not limited to, salaries, fringe
benefits, utilities, supplies and grounds maintenance are divided into
one or more line items, "original amount" means the amount of a line
item that was appropriated to such line item at the start of the fiscal year,
and "actual amount" means the amount of a line item at the conclusion
of the fiscal year.
Sec. 32. Section 10-222 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-1 21 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Each local board of education shall prepare an itemized estimate of
the cost of maintenance of public schools for the ensuing year and shall
submit such estimate to the board of finance in each town or city having
a board of finance, to the board of selectmen in each town having no
board of finance or otherwise to the authority making appropriations
for the school district, not later than two months preceding the annual
meeting at which appropriations are to be made. Such estimate shall
include the original amount and actual amount of each line item for the
two fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year in which such
estimate is being prepared and the original amount and current amount
of each line item for the fiscal year in which such estimate is being
prepared. The board or authority that receives such estimate shall, not
later than ten days after the date the board of education submits such
estimate, make spending recommendations and suggestions to such
board of education as to how such board of education may consolidate
noneducational services and realize financial efficiencies. Such board of
education may accept or reject the suggestions of the board of finance,
board of selectmen or appropriating authority and shall provide the
board of finance, board of selectmen or appropriating authority with a
written explanation of the reason for any rejection. The money
appropriated by any municipality for the maintenance of public schools
shall be expended by and in the discretion of the board of education.
Except as provided in this subsection, any such board may transfer any
unexpended or uncontracted-for portion of any appropriation for
school purposes to any other item of such itemized estimate. Boards
may, by adopting policies and procedures, authorize designated
personnel to make limited transfers under emergency circumstances if
the urgent need for the transfer prevents the board from meeting in a
timely fashion to consider such transfer. All transfers made in such
instances shall be announced at the next regularly scheduled meeting of
the board and a written explanation of such transfer shall be provided
to the legislative body of the municipality or, in a municipality where
the legislative body is a town meeting, to the board of selectmen.
Public Act No. 26-1 22 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Expenditures by the board of education shall not exceed the
appropriation made by the municipality, with such money as may be
received from other sources for school purposes. If any occasion arises
whereby additional funds are needed by such board, the chairman of
such board shall notify the board of finance, board of selectmen or
appropriating authority, as the case may be, and shall submit a request
for additional funds in the same manner as is provided for departments,
boards or agencies of the municipality and no additional funds shall be
expended unless such supplemental appropriation shall be granted and
no supplemental expenditures shall be made in excess of those granted
through the appropriating authority. The annual report of the board of
education shall, in accordance with section 10-224, include a summary
showing (1) the total cost of the maintenance of schools, (2) the amount
received from the state and other sources for the maintenance of schools,
(3) the net cost to the municipality of the maintenance of schools, and
(4) the balance of any nonlapsing, unexpended funds account described
in section 10-248a. For purposes of this [subsection] section, "meeting"
means a meeting, as defined in section 1-200, [and] "itemized estimate"
means an estimate in which broad budgetary categories including, but
not limited to, salaries, fringe benefits, utilities, supplies and grounds
maintenance are divided into one or more line items, "original amount"
means the amount of a line item that was appropriated to such line item
at the start of the fiscal year, and "actual amount" means the amount of
a line item at the conclusion of the fiscal year.
Sec. 33. Subsection (a) of section 10-51 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The fiscal year of a regional school district shall be July first to June
thirtieth. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, not less than
two weeks before the annual meeting held pursuant to section 10-47, the
board shall hold a public district meeting to present a proposed budget
Public Act No. 26-1 23 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
for the next fiscal year. Any public district meeting held pursuant to this
section may be accessible to the public by means of electronic equipment
or by means of electronic equipment in conjunction with an in-person
meeting, in accordance with the provisions of section 1-225a. Such
proposed budget shall include the original amount and actual amount
of each line item in the budget for the two fiscal years immediately
preceding the fiscal year in which such proposed budget is being
presented and the original amount and current amount of each line item
for the budget of the fiscal year in which such proposed budget is being
presented. Any person may recommend the inclusion or deletion of
expenditures at such time. After the public hearing, the board shall
prepare an annual budget for the next fiscal year, make available on
request copies thereof and deliver a reasonable number to the town
clerk of each of the towns in the district at least five days before the
annual meeting. At the annual meeting on the first Monday in May, the
board shall present a budget which includes a statement of (1) estimated
receipts and expenditures for the next fiscal year, (2) estimated receipts
and expenditures for the current fiscal year, (3) estimated surplus or
deficit in operating funds at the end of the current fiscal year, (4) bonded
or other debt, (5) estimated per pupil expenditure for the current and
for the next fiscal year, (6) the original amount and actual amount of
each line item in the budget for the two fiscal years immediately
preceding the fiscal year in which such budget is being presented and
the original amount and current amount of each line item for the budget
of the fiscal year in which such budget is being presented, and [(6)] (7)
such other information as is necessary in the opinion of the board.
Persons present and eligible to vote under section 7-6 may accept or
reject the proposed budget except as provided below. No person who is
eligible to vote in more than one town in the regional school district is
eligible to cast more than one vote on any issue considered at a regional
school district meeting or referendum held pursuant to this section. Any
person who violates this section by fraudulently casting more than one
vote or ballot per issue shall be fined not more than three thousand five
Public Act No. 26-1 24 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
hundred dollars and shall be imprisoned not more than two years and
shall be disenfranchised. The regional board of education may, in the
call to the meeting, designate that the vote on the motion to adopt the
budget shall be by paper ballots at the district meeting held on the
budget or by a "yes" or "no" vote on the voting tabulators in each of the
member towns on the day following the district meeting. If submitted
to a vote by voting tabulator, questions may be included on the ballot
for persons voting "no" to indicate whether the budget is too high or too
low, provided the vote on such questions shall be for advisory purposes
only and not binding upon the board. Two hundred or more persons
qualified to vote in any regional district meeting called to adopt a
budget may petition the regional board, in writing, at least three days
prior to such meeting, requesting that any item or items on the call of
such meeting be submitted to the persons qualified to vote in the
meeting for a vote by paper ballot or on the voting tabulators in each of
the member towns on the day following the district meeting and in
accordance with the appropriate procedures provided in section 7-7. If
a majority of such persons voting reject the budget, the board shall,
within four weeks thereafter and upon notice of not less than one week,
call a district meeting to consider the same or an amended budget. Such
meetings shall be convened at such intervals until a budget is approved.
If the budget is not approved before the beginning of a fiscal year, the
disbursing officer for each member town, or the designee of such officer,
shall make necessary expenditures to such district in amounts equal to
the total of the town's appropriation to the district for the previous year
and the town's proportionate share in any increment in debt service over
the previous fiscal year, pursuant to section 7-405 until the budget is
approved. The town shall receive credit for such expenditures once the
budget is approved for the fiscal year. After the budget is approved, the
board shall estimate the share of the net expenses to be paid by each
member town in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and
notify the treasurer thereof. With respect to adoption of a budget for the
period from the organization of the board to the beginning of the first
Public Act No. 26-1 25 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
full fiscal year, the board may use the above procedure at any time
within such period. If the board needs to submit a supplementary
budget, the general procedure specified in this section shall be used. As
used in this section, "original amount" and "actual amount" have the
same meanings as provided in section 10-222, as amended by this act.
Sec. 34. Section 10-233m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Each local or regional board of education that assigns a school
resource officer to any school under the jurisdiction of such board shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding with a local law
enforcement agency regarding the role and responsibility of such school
resource officer. [Such] Not later than January 1, 2027, such
memorandum of understanding shall (1) be maintained in a central
location in the school district and posted on the Internet web site of the
school district and each school in which such school resource officer is
assigned, (2) include provisions addressing daily interactions between
students and school personnel with school resource officers, and (3)
include a graduated response model for student discipline. Any such
memorandum of understanding entered into, extended, updated or
amended (A) on or after July 1, 2021, shall include a provision that
requires all school resource officers to complete, while in the
performance of their duties as school resource officers and during
periods when such school resource officers are assigned to be at the
school, any separate training specifically related to social-emotional
learning and restorative practices provided to certified employees of the
school pursuant to section 10-148a, and (B) on or after July 1, 2023, shall
include provisions specifying a school resource officer's duties
concerning, and procedures for, the restraint of students, use of
firearms, school-based arrests and reporting of any investigations and
behavioral interventions of challenging behavior or conflict that
escalates to violence or constitutes a crime, pursuant to the provisions
Public Act No. 26-1 26 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
of section 10-233p, provided such provisions are in accordance with any
laws or policies concerning the duties of police officers. Each such
memorandum of understanding shall be updated not less frequently
than every three years. For the purposes of this section, "school resource
officer" means a sworn police officer of a local law enforcement agency
who has been assigned to a school pursuant to an agreement between
the local or regional board of education and the chief of police of a local
law enforcement agency.
Sec. 35. Subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of section 10-51 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, and each fiscal year
thereafter, a regional board of education, by a majority vote of its
members, may create a reserve fund for educational expenditures. Such
fund shall thereafter be termed "reserve fund for educational
expenditures". The aggregate amount of annual and supplemental
appropriations by a district to such fund shall not exceed two per cent
of the annual district budget for such fiscal year. Annual appropriations
to such fund shall be included in the share of net expenses to be paid by
each member town. Supplemental appropriations to such fund may be
made from estimated fiscal year end surplus in operating funds. During
any fiscal year, a regional board of education may deposit any funds
previously appropriated to and currently in a separate reserve fund for
capital and nonrecurring expenditures under the control of such board
in the reserve fund for educational expenditures. Interest and
investment earnings received with respect to amounts held in the
reserve fund for educational expenditures shall be credited to such
fund. The board shall annually submit a complete and detailed report
of the condition of such fund to the member towns. Upon the
recommendation and approval by the regional board of education, any
part or the whole of such fund may be used for educational
Public Act No. 26-1 27 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
expenditures. Upon the approval of any such expenditure an
appropriation shall be set up, plainly designated for the educational
expenditure for which it has been authorized. Any unexpended portion
of such appropriation remaining shall revert to [said] such fund. If any
authorized appropriation is set up pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection and through unforeseen circumstances the board is unable
to expend the total amount of such appropriation, the board, by a
majority vote of its members, may terminate such appropriation which
then shall no longer be in effect. Such fund may be discontinued, after
the recommendation and approval by the regional board of education,
and any amounts held in the fund shall be transferred to the general
fund of the district. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each
fiscal year thereafter, each board shall make available, and annually
update, information regarding such fund, including, but not limited to,
the total balance of the fund, the amount deposited into such fund in a
fiscal year and an accounting of the expenditures made from such fund.
Sec. 36. Subsection (a) of section 10-214 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) Each local or regional board of education shall provide annually
to each pupil in kindergarten and grades one and three to five, inclusive,
a vision screening and may additionally provide such vision screening
annually to each pupil in preschool and grade two. Such vision
screening may be performed using a Snellen chart or an equivalent
screening device, or an automated vision screening device. The
superintendent of schools shall give written notice to the parent or
guardian of each pupil (1) who is found to have any defect of vision or
disease of the eyes, with a brief statement describing such defect or
disease and a recommendation for the pupil to be examined by an
optometrist licensed under chapter 380 or an ophthalmologist licensed
under chapter 370, and (2) who did not receive such vision screening,
Public Act No. 26-1 28 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
with a brief statement explaining why such pupil did not receive such
vision screening.
Sec. 37. Subsection (c) of section 10-266aa of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) The program shall be phased in as provided in this subsection. (1)
For the school year commencing in 1998, and for each school year
thereafter, the program shall be in operation in the Hartford, New
Haven and Bridgeport regions. The Hartford program shall operate as
a continuation of the program described in section 10-266j. Students
who reside in Hartford, New Haven or Bridgeport may attend school in
another school district in the region and students who reside in such
other school districts may attend school in Hartford, New Haven or
Bridgeport, provided, beginning with the 2001-2002 school year, the
proportion of students who are not minority students to the total
number of students leaving Hartford, Bridgeport or New Haven to
participate in the program shall not be greater than the proportion of
students who were not minority students in the prior school year to the
total number of students enrolled in Hartford, Bridgeport or New
Haven in the prior school year. The regional educational service center
operating the program shall make program participation decisions in
accordance with the requirements of this subdivision. (2) For the school
year commencing in 2000, and for each school year thereafter, the
program shall be in operation in New London, provided beginning with
the 2001-2002 school year, the proportion of students who are not
minority students to the total number of students leaving New London
to participate in the program shall not be greater than the proportion of
students who were not minority students in the prior year to the total
number of students enrolled in New London in the prior school year.
The regional educational service center operating the program shall
make program participation decisions in accordance with this
Public Act No. 26-1 29 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
subdivision. (3) The Department of Education may provide, within
available appropriations, grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
to the remaining regional educational service centers to assist school
districts in planning for a voluntary program of student enrollment in
every priority school district, pursuant to section 10-266p, which is
interested in participating in accordance with this subdivision. For the
school year commencing in 2003, and for each school year thereafter, the
voluntary enrollment program may be in operation in every priority
school district in the state. Students from other school districts in the
area of a priority school district, as determined by the regional
educational service center pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, may
attend school in the priority school district, provided such students
bring racial, ethnic and economic diversity to the priority school district
and do not increase the racial, ethnic and economic isolation in the
priority school district. (4) For the school year commencing July 1, 2024,
and each school year thereafter, there shall be a pilot program in
operation in Danbury and Norwalk. The pilot program shall serve (A)
up to fifty students who reside in Danbury, and such students may
attend school in the school districts for the towns of New Fairfield,
Brookfield, Bethel, Ridgefield and Redding, and (B) up to fifty students
who (i) reside in Norwalk, and such students may attend school in the
school districts for the towns of Darien, New Canaan, Wilton, Weston
and Westport, and (ii) reside in Darien, New Canaan, Wilton, Weston
and Westport, and such students may attend school in the school district
for the town of Norwalk. School districts which receive students under
this subdivision as part of the pilot program shall allow such students
to attend school in the district until they graduate from high school. (5)
For the school year commencing July 1, 2022, and each school year
thereafter, the town of Guilford shall be eligible to participate in the
program as a receiving district and a sending district with New Haven.
(6) For the school year commencing July 1, 2026, and each school year
thereafter, the town of Madison shall be eligible to participate in the
program as a receiving district and a sending district with New Haven.
Public Act No. 26-1 30 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 38. Subsection (a) of section 10-153d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) (1) Within thirty days prior to the date on which the local or
regional board of education is to commence negotiations pursuant to
this section, such board of education shall meet and confer with the
board of finance in each town or city having a board of finance, with the
board of selectmen in each town having no board of finance and
otherwise with the authority making appropriations therein. A member
of such board of finance, such board of selectmen, or such other
authority making appropriations, shall be permitted to be present
during negotiations pursuant to this section and shall provide such
fiscal information as may be requested by the board of education.
(2) At least one member of the local or regional board of education
shall be present during negotiations pursuant to this section, except no
member of the local or regional board of education who is also a
member of the organization that has been designated or elected as the
exclusive representative of an administrators' unit or a teachers' unit
may be present during negotiations pursuant to this section.
Sec. 39. Section 10-206 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Each local or regional board of education shall require each pupil
enrolled in the public schools to have health assessments pursuant to
the provisions of this section. Such assessments shall be conducted by
(1) a legally qualified practitioner of medicine, (2) an advanced practice
registered nurse or registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378,
(3) a physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter 370, (4) a school
medical advisor, or (5) a legally qualified practitioner of medicine, an
advanced practice registered nurse or a physician assistant stationed at
any military base, to ascertain whether such pupil is suffering from any
Public Act No. 26-1 31 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
physical disability tending to prevent such pupil from receiving the full
benefit of school work and to ascertain whether such school work
should be modified in order to prevent injury to the pupil or to secure
for the pupil a suitable program of education. No health assessment
shall be made of any [child] pupil enrolled in the public schools unless
such examination is made in the presence of the parent or guardian or
in the presence of another school employee. The parent or guardian of
such [child] pupil shall receive prior written notice and shall have a
reasonable opportunity to be present at such assessment or to provide
for such assessment himself or herself. A local or regional board of
education may deny continued attendance in public school to any
[child] pupil who fails to obtain the health assessments required under
this section.
(b) Each local or regional board of education shall require each [child]
pupil to have a health assessment prior to public school enrollment. The
assessment shall include: (1) A physical examination which shall
include hematocrit or hemoglobin tests, height, weight, blood pressure,
a medical risk assessment for lead poisoning and, when indicated by
such assessment, a test of the [child's] pupil's blood lead level, and,
beginning with the 2003-2004 school year, a chronic disease assessment
which shall include, but not be limited to, asthma. The assessment form
shall include (A) a check box for the provider conducting the
assessment, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, to indicate an
asthma diagnosis, (B) screening questions relating to appropriate public
health concerns to be answered by the parent or guardian, and (C)
screening questions to be answered by such provider; (2) an updating
of immunizations as required under section 10-204a, provided a
registered nurse may only update said immunizations pursuant to a
written order by a physician or physician assistant, licensed pursuant to
chapter 370, or an advanced practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant
to chapter 378; (3) vision, hearing, speech and gross dental screenings;
and (4) such other information, including health and developmental
Public Act No. 26-1 32 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
history, as the physician feels is necessary and appropriate. The
assessment shall also include tests for tuberculosis, sickle cell anemia
and Cooley's anemia where the local or regional board of education
determines after consultation with the school medical advisor and the
local health department, or in the case of a regional board of education,
each local health department, that such tests are necessary, provided a
registered nurse may only perform said tests pursuant to the written
order of a physician or physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter
370, or an advanced practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant to
chapter 378.
(c) Each local or regional board of education shall require each pupil
enrolled in the public schools to have health assessments in either grade
six or grade seven and in either grade nine or grade ten. The assessment
shall include: (1) A physical examination which shall include hematocrit
or hemoglobin tests, height, weight, blood pressure, and, beginning
with the 2003-2004 school year, a chronic disease assessment which shall
include, but not be limited to, asthma as defined by the Commissioner
of Public Health pursuant to subsection (c) of section 19a-62a. The
assessment form shall include (A) a check box for the provider
conducting the assessment, as provided in subsection (a) of this section,
to indicate an asthma diagnosis, (B) screening questions relating to
appropriate public health concerns to be answered by the parent or
guardian, and (C) screening questions to be answered by such provider;
(2) an updating of immunizations as required under section 10-204a,
provided a registered nurse may only update said immunizations
pursuant to a written order of a physician or physician assistant,
licensed pursuant to chapter 370, or an advanced practice registered
nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378; (3) vision, hearing, postural and
gross dental screenings; and (4) such other information including a
health history as the physician feels is necessary and appropriate. The
assessment shall also include tests for tuberculosis and sickle cell
anemia or Cooley's anemia where the local or regional board of
Public Act No. 26-1 33 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
education, in consultation with the school medical advisor and the local
health department, or in the case of a regional board of education, each
local health department, determines that said screening or test is
necessary, provided a registered nurse may only perform said tests
pursuant to the written order of a physician or physician assistant,
licensed pursuant to chapter 370, or an advanced practice registered
nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378.
(d) The results of each assessment done pursuant to this section and
the results of screenings done pursuant to section 10-214, as amended
by this act, shall be recorded on forms supplied by the State Board of
Education. Each school nurse may reject such results submitted on
forms other than the forms supplied by the State Board of Education and
require the resubmission of such results on such forms supplied by the
State Board of Education. An asthma action plan shall be included with
each assessment form that indicates an asthma diagnosis pursuant to
subsections (b) and (c) of this section. Such information shall be included
in the cumulative health record of each pupil and shall be kept on file in
the school such pupil attends. If a pupil permanently leaves the
jurisdiction of the board of education, the pupil's original cumulative
health record shall be sent to the chief administrative officer of the
school district to which such student moves. The board of education
transmitting such health record shall retain a true copy. Each physician,
advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, or physician
assistant performing health assessments and screenings pursuant to this
section and section 10-214, as amended by this act, shall completely fill
out and sign each form and any recommendations concerning the pupil
shall be in writing.
(e) Appropriate school health personnel shall review the results of
each assessment and screening as recorded pursuant to subsection (d)
of this section. When, in the judgment of such health personnel, a pupil,
as defined in section 10-206a, is in need of further testing or treatment,
Public Act No. 26-1 34 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the superintendent of schools shall give written notice to the parent or
guardian of such pupil and shall make reasonable efforts to assure that
such further testing or treatment is provided. Such reasonable efforts
shall include a determination of whether or not the parent or guardian
has obtained the necessary testing or treatment for the pupil, and, if not,
advising the parent or guardian on how such testing or treatment may
be obtained. The results of such further testing or treatment shall be
recorded pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and shall be
reviewed by school health personnel pursuant to this subsection.
(f) On and after October 1, 2017, each local or regional board of
education shall report to the local health department and the
Department of Public Health, on an triennial basis, the total number of
pupils per school and per school district having a diagnosis of asthma
(1) at the time of public school enrollment, (2) in grade six or seven, and
(3) in grade nine or ten. The report shall contain the asthma information
collected as required under subsections (b) and (c) of this section and
shall include pupil age, gender, race, ethnicity and school. Beginning on
October 1, 2021, and every three years thereafter, the Department of
Public Health shall review the asthma screening information reported
pursuant to this section and shall submit a report to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health and education concerning asthma trends and
distributions among pupils enrolled in the public schools. The report
shall be submitted in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
and shall include, but not be limited to, (A) trends and findings based
on pupil age, gender, race, ethnicity, school and the education reference
group, as determined by the Department of Education for the town or
regional school district in which such school is located, and (B) activities
of the asthma screening monitoring system maintained under section
19a-62a.
Sec. 40. Subsection (g) of section 10-233c of the 2026 supplement to
Public Act No. 26-1 35 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(g) On and after July 1, 2015, all suspensions pursuant to this section
shall be in-school suspensions, except a local or regional board of
education may authorize the administration of schools under its
direction to impose an out-of-school suspension on any pupil in (1)
grades three to twelve, inclusive, if, during the hearing held pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, (A) the administration determines that the
pupil being suspended poses such a danger to persons or property or
such a disruption of the educational process that the pupil shall be
excluded from school during the period of suspension, or (B) the
administration determines that an out-of-school suspension is
appropriate for such pupil based on evidence of (i) previous disciplinary
problems that have led to suspensions or expulsion of such pupil, and
(ii) efforts by the administration to address such disciplinary problems
through means other than out-of-school suspension or expulsion,
including positive behavioral support strategies, or (2) grades preschool
to two, inclusive, if during the hearing held pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section, the administration (A) determines that an out-of-school
suspension is appropriate for such pupil based on evidence that such
pupil's conduct on school grounds is behavior that causes serious
physical harm, (B) requires that such pupil receives services that are
trauma-informed and developmentally appropriate and align with any
behavioral intervention plan, individualized education program or plan
pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended
from time to time, for such pupil upon such pupil's return to school
immediately following the out-of-school suspension, and (C) considers
whether to convene a planning and placement team meeting for the
purposes of conducting an evaluation to determine whether such pupil
may require special education or related services. An out-of-school
suspension imposed under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not
exceed ten school days, and an out-of-school suspension imposed under
Public Act No. 26-1 36 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
subdivision (2) of this subsection shall not exceed five school days. An
in-school suspension may be served in the school that the pupil attends,
or in any school building under the jurisdiction of the local or regional
board of education, as determined by such board. Nothing in this
section shall limit a person's duty as a mandated reporter pursuant to
section 17-101a to report suspected child abuse or neglect.
Sec. 41. Subsection (d) of section 10-233d of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) No local or regional board of education is required to offer an
alternative educational opportunity, except in accordance with this
section. Any pupil under sixteen years of age who is expelled shall be
offered an alternative educational opportunity, which shall be (1)
alternative education, as defined by section 10-74j, with an
individualized learning plan, if such board provides such alternative
education, or (2) in accordance with the standards adopted by the State
Board of Education, pursuant to section 10-233o, during the period of
expulsion, provided any parent or guardian of such pupil who does not
choose to have such parent's or guardian's child enrolled in an
alternative educational opportunity shall not be subject to the
provisions of section 10-184. Any pupil expelled for the first time and
the second time who is between the ages of sixteen and eighteen and
who wishes to continue such pupil's education shall be offered such an
alternative educational opportunity if such pupil complies with
conditions established by such pupil's local or regional board of
education. Such alternative educational opportunity may include, but
shall not be limited to, the placement of a pupil who is at least seventeen
years of age in an adult education program pursuant to section 10-69.
Any pupil participating in any such adult education program during a
period of expulsion shall not be required to withdraw from school under
section 10-184. A local or regional board of education shall count the
Public Act No. 26-1 37 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
expulsion of a pupil when the pupil was under sixteen years of age for
purposes of determining whether an alternative educational
opportunity is required for such pupil when such pupil is between the
ages of sixteen and eighteen. A local or regional board of education may
offer an alternative educational opportunity to a pupil for whom such
alternative educational opportunity is not required pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 42. Subsection (h) of section 10-236b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(h) Each local or regional board of education shall notify a parent or
guardian of a student who is placed in physical restraint or seclusion
[not later than twenty-four hours after] on the day the student was
placed in physical restraint or seclusion and shall make a reasonable
effort to provide such notification immediately after such physical
restraint or seclusion is initiated.
Sec. 43. Section 10-357e of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Education shall allocate funds, as specified in
the annual budget of the Department of Education, to allow the State
Education Resource Center, established pursuant to section 10-357a, to
provide professional development services, technical assistance and
evaluation activities, policy analysis and other forms of assistance to
local and regional boards of education, the Department of Education,
state and local charter schools, as defined in section 10-66aa, the
Technical Education and Career System, established pursuant to section
10-95, providers of school readiness programs, as defined in section 10-
16p, and other educational entities and providers. The State Education
Resource Center shall expend such funds in accordance with procedures
and conditions prescribed by the commissioner.
Public Act No. 26-1 38 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 44. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Not later than April 1, 2027,
the Connecticut Center for School Safety and Crisis Prevention at
Western Connecticut State University, in collaboration with the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, shall (1)
develop a clear definition for crisis response drills for purposes of
section 10-231 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, (2) develop
standardized terminology for the administration and review of crisis
response drills, (3) develop guidance on (A) standardized responses to
crises, and (B) standardized debriefing protocols following a crisis, and
(4) develop an evaluation template for crisis response drills that allows
school districts to use feedback from participants of the crisis response
drill to assess the efficacy of the crisis response drill and make
adjustments to subsequent crisis response drills to improve
preparedness while preventing emotional harm and supporting
psychological safety.
(b) The Connecticut Center for School Safety and Crisis Prevention at
Western Connecticut State University, in collaboration with the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, shall conduct
a study of the impact of crisis response drills on the school community.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2028, the Connecticut Center for School
Safety and Crisis Prevention at Western Connecticut State University
shall submit (1) the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of this section, and (2) a report on the study conducted
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, including any
recommendations, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 45. Section 10-231 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Each local and regional board of education shall provide for a fire
Public Act No. 26-1 39 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
drill to be held in the schools of such board not later than thirty days
after the first day of each school year and at least once each month
thereafter, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Each such board shall substitute a crisis response drill for a fire
drill once every three months and shall develop the format of such crisis
response drill [in consultation] in accordance with the crisis response
protocols described in section 46 of this act and with the appropriate
local law enforcement agency. A representative of such agency may
supervise and participate in any such crisis response drill.
Sec. 46. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) For the school year commencing
July 1, 2027, and each school year thereafter, each local and regional
board of education providing for a crisis response drill to be conducted
pursuant to section 10-231 of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, shall ensure the following for each such drill: (1) The utilization of
the (A) definition for crisis response drills, (B) standardized terminology
for the administration and review of crisis response drills, and (C)
guidance on standardized responses to crises and debriefing protocols
following a crisis, developed by the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection pursuant to section 44 of this act, (2) that the
school security and safety committee, as described in section 10-222m of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, collaborates with the school
climate committee, as described in section 10-222ff of the general
statutes, to plan crisis response drills that prioritize the physical and
psychological safety of students and school personnel, (3) that crisis
drills are (A) trauma-informed, including the utilization of an approach
that takes into account prior traumatic experiences, and (B) designed to
prevent emotional harm to and support the psychological safety of
students and school personnel, with mental health professionals'
participation integrated throughout the crisis response drill, (4) that
prior to conducting a crisis response drill, school personnel provide age-
appropriate education for students and training for school personnel to
Public Act No. 26-1 40 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
build knowledge and skills to reduce the potential for confusion or
emotional distress, including a review of the purpose and procedures
for crisis response drills prior to the first crisis response drill of the
school year and notification to students, school personnel and parents
and guardians one week in advance of conducting a crisis response drill,
(5) that school personnel communicate in a clear manner to ensure
understanding of the nature and purpose of crisis response drills to the
parents and guardians of students at the school prior to conducting a
crisis response drill, (6) that at the commencement of the crisis response
drill, students and school personnel are informed that they are
participating in a crisis response drill in order to avoid confusion when
an actual emergency situation is occurring, (7) that accommodations for
each student with a cognitive, physical or sensory disability are
provided, to the extent practicable, during a crisis response drill to
ensure the safety and participation of such student, (8) that (A) a crisis
response drill conducted with students does not include an active
assailant simulation or simulated violence with highly sensorial
elements such as fake assailants, firearms, gunfire sounds, blood or
injuries, and (B) a crisis response drill that is conducted outside of the
regular school day and exclusively for school personnel, first responders
and other school volunteers may include an active assailant simulation
or such simulated violence, and (9) that each such drill is evaluated
using the evaluation template developed pursuant to section 44 of this
act.
Sec. 47. Subsection (c) of section 10-222m of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) Each local and regional board of education shall (1) annually
submit the school security and safety plan for each school under the
jurisdiction of such board, developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, to the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
Public Act No. 26-1 41 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
and (2) make any portion of such school security and safety plan that is
not prohibited from disclosure pursuant to section 1-210 available to
members of the school community upon request.
Sec. 48. Section 7-450c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes or special
act 01-1, no municipality or special taxing district that provides, as of
July 11, 2007, a pension and retirement system for its officers and
employees and their beneficiaries shall diminish or eliminate any right
or benefit granted to any retiree under such retirement or pension
system that was in effect on the date of such retiree's retirement. The
provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a
municipality or special taxing district from changing the administration
of such retiree's retirement benefits as long as the rights and benefits
provided to such retiree after any change in the administration are at
least equivalent to the rights and benefits provided prior to such change.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes or special
act, no municipality or special taxing district that provides a pension
and retirement system for its officers and employees and their
beneficiaries shall diminish or eliminate any right or benefit granted to
any retiree under such pension or retirement system due to permanent
partial disability benefits received on or after July 1, 2026, by such retiree
in accordance with section 31-308. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to impair or alter the provisions of any collective bargaining
agreement in effect before July 1, 2026.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes or special
act, a municipality or special taxing district that provides a pension and
retirement system for its officers and employees and their beneficiaries
shall include temporary total disability and temporary partial disability
benefits received by an employee pursuant to chapter 568 as wages for
Public Act No. 26-1 42 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
purposes of the calculation of pension or retirement benefits to be paid
to such employee in retirement, provided (1) the sum of such benefits
and any other wages or compensation used to calculate such employee's
pension or retirement benefits shall not exceed one hundred per cent of
such employee's wages from such municipality or special taxing district
in effect immediately prior to the injury for which the employee
received such benefits, and (2) the provisions of this section shall not
apply to the municipal employees retirement plan set forth in part II of
chapter 113. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or alter
the provisions of any collective bargaining agreement in effect before
July 1, 2026.
Sec. 49. (Effective from passage) The Comptroller shall conduct a study
on the considerations necessary for a municipality that does not
currently provide a defined pension plan to each police officer and
firefighter employed by such municipality through participation in
either (1) the municipal employees' retirement system, pursuant to
section 7-427 of the general statutes, or (2) any other defined pension
plan that provides such individuals with benefits that are comparable
or superior to those benefits offered by the municipal employees'
retirement system, to successfully transition such individuals from such
municipality's current retirement system to such defined pension plan
described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section. Not later than
January 1, 2028, the Comptroller shall submit a report of the results of
such study, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
employees.
Sec. 50. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 51 to 57, inclusive, of this act:
(1) "Employee" means an individual who is employed at a warehouse
distribution center and who is not exempt from the minimum wage and
Public Act No. 26-1 43 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
overtime requirements of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as
amended from time to time. "Employee" does not include a driver or
courier traveling to or from a warehouse distribution center;
(2) "Employer" means an individual, corporation, partnership,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability
company, business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency,
instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity, whether
domestic or foreign, that directly or indirectly, or through an agent or
any other person, including through the services of a third-party
employer, temporary services, staffing agency, independent contractor
or any similar entity, at any time in the prior twelve months, employs
or exercises control over the wages, hours or working conditions of two
hundred fifty or more employees at a single warehouse distribution
center in the state or one thousand or more employees at one or more
warehouse distribution centers in the state;
(3) "Quota" means a work performance standard where:
(A) An employee is assigned or required to perform at a specified
productivity speed or a quantified number of tasks or to handle or
produce a quantified amount of material within a defined time period;
(B) Actions by an employee are categorized and measured between
time performing tasks and not performing tasks within a defined time
period;
(C) Increments of time within a defined time period during which an
employee is or is not doing a particular activity are measured, recorded
or tallied; or
(D) An employee's performance is ranked in relation to the
performance of other employees;
(4) "Work speed data" means information an employer collects,
Public Act No. 26-1 44 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
stores, analyzes or interprets relating to an individual employee's
performance of a quota, including, but not limited to, quantities of tasks
performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates
or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or metrics of employee
performance in relation to a quota and time categorized as performing
tasks or not performing tasks. "Work speed data" does not include
qualitative performance data, personnel records, wage statements or
data an employer collects, stores, analyzes or interprets that does not
relate to the performance of a quota, except for any content of such
records that includes work speed data; and
(5) "Warehouse distribution center" means a warehouse or
warehouse complex owned or leased by an establishment as defined by
any of the following North American Industry Classification System
Codes, however such establishment is denominated: (A) 493110 for
General Warehousing and Storage; (B) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers,
Durable Goods; (C) 424 for Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods;
(D) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order Houses; (E) 492110
for Couriers and Express Delivery Services; (F) 452311 for Warehouse
Clubs and Supercenters; (G) 452319 for All Other General Merchandise
Stores; and (H) 444110 for Home Centers.
Sec. 51. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) An employer shall provide
to each employee a written description of each quota to which such
employee is subject, including any potential adverse employment action
that may result from a failure to satisfy such quota. Such written
description shall be provided to an employer's current employees not
later than August 1, 2026. For employees hired after August 1, 2026, such
written description shall be provided to the employee upon hire.
(b) Whenever an employer makes a change to an existing quota for
an employee that results in a new quota for such employee, an employer
shall:
Public Act No. 26-1 45 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(1) Notify the employee of such change as soon as practicable, either
verbally or in writing, and prior to the effective date of such new quota;
and
(2) Provide the employee with a written description of the new quota
to which such employee is subject not later than two business days after
the change is made.
(c) Any written description required pursuant to this section shall be
provided either directly to an employee or via electronic mail.
Sec. 52. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No quota shall:
(1) Prevent compliance with the provisions of section 31-51ii of the
general statutes concerning meal periods;
(2) Interfere with an employee's use of the bathroom facilities,
including reasonable travel time to and from the bathroom facilities;
(3) Set a performance standard that measurers an employee's total
output over an increment of time that is shorter than such employee's
work day; or
(4) Set a performance standard that is based solely on ranking the
performance of an employee in relation to the performance of other
employees.
Sec. 53. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No employer shall take any
adverse action against an employee for failing to satisfy a quota that
violates the provisions of section 52 of this act or has not previously been
provided to the employee pursuant to section 51 of this act.
Sec. 54. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Each employer shall establish,
maintain and preserve contemporaneous, true and accurate records of
(1) each individual employee's work speed data; (2) the aggregated
work speed data for similar employees at the same warehouse
Public Act No. 26-1 46 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
distribution center; and (3) the written description provided to each
employee pursuant to section 51 of this act. Such records shall be
maintained for a period of three years. Nothing in this section shall
require an employer to establish, maintain and preserve the records
required pursuant to this section if such employer does not assign or
require quotas or collect, store, analyze or interpret work speed data.
Sec. 55. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) If an employee believes
satisfying a quota caused or will cause a violation of section 52 of this
act, such employee may request from such employee's employer: (1) A
written description of each quota the employee is subject to; (2) a copy
of the employee's personal work speed data for the prior ninety days;
and (3) a copy of aggregated work speed data for similar employees at
the same warehouse distribution center for the prior ninety days.
(b) A former employee may request from a former employer: (1) A
written description of each quota the employee was subject to for the
ninety days prior to the employee's separation from employment with
such employer; (2) a copy of the employee's personal work speed data
for the ninety days prior to such employee's separation from
employment with such employer; and (3) a copy of aggregated work
speed data for similar employees at the same warehouse distribution
center for the ninety days prior to such employee's separation from
employment with such employer. A former employee may only make
one request under this section.
(c) An employer shall provide a written copy of any records
requested pursuant to this section as soon as practicable, but not later
than ten calendar days after receipt of such request. Such written copy
shall be provided (1) in both English and the primary language of the
employee requesting such records, and (2) (A) for a current employee,
directly to the employee or via electronic mail, or (B) for a former
employee, either in person at a mutually convenient time or via a
mutually convenient delivery method.
Public Act No. 26-1 47 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 56. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) No employer shall discharge
or in any way retaliate, discriminate or take any adverse action against
any employee or former employee for (1) making a request pursuant to
section 55 of this act, or (2) filing a civil action pursuant to section 57 of
this act.
(b) (1) If an employer discharges or in any way retaliates,
discriminates or takes any adverse action against any employee or
former employee within ninety days after such employee engages in or
attempts to engage in the activities described in subsection (a) of this
section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such adverse action
is in violation of this section.
(2) For an adverse action taken within ninety days of an employee or
former employee engaging or attempting to engage in the activity
described in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, such
presumption shall only apply if such adverse action was taken within
ninety days of an employee or former employee's first request made in
a calendar year.
(3) Such presumption may be rebutted by clear and convincing
evidence that (A) the adverse action was taken for other permissible
reasons, and (B) the employee engaging or attempting to engage in the
activities described in subsection (a) of this section was not a motivating
factor in the employer taking such adverse action.
Sec. 57. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) An employee or former
employee aggrieved by a violation of sections 51 to 56, inclusive, of this
act, or the Attorney General on behalf of a group of employees or former
employees aggrieved by a violation of sections 51 to 56, inclusive, of this
act, may bring a civil action in the Superior Court to recover damages,
civil penalties and such injunctive relief as the court deems appropriate.
In any civil action brought under this section in which the plaintiff
prevails, the court may, in addition to the relief provided pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-1 48 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
subsection (b) of this section, award reasonable attorney's fees and costs,
to be taxed by the court.
(b) An employer who violates a provision of sections 51 to 56,
inclusive, of this act may be assessed a civil penalty by the court of (1)
one thousand dollars for a first violation, (2) two thousand dollars for a
second violation, or (3) three thousand dollars for a third or subsequent
violations.
Sec. 58. Section 51-198 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The Supreme Court shall consist of one Chief Justice and six
associate judges, who shall, at the time of their appointment, also be
appointed judges of the Superior Court.
(b) In addition thereto, each Chief Justice or associate judge of the
Supreme Court who elects to retain office but to retire from full-time
active service shall continue to be a member of the Supreme Court
during the remainder of [his or her] such justice's or judge's term of
office and during the term of any reappointment under section 51-50i,
until [he or she] such justice or judge attains the age of seventy years.
[He or she] Such justice or judge shall be entitled to participate in the
meetings of the judges of the Supreme Court and vote as a member
thereof.
(c) If an associate judge of the Supreme Court is appointed to serve
as the Chief Court Administrator pursuant to section 51-1b, and chooses
to cease serving as an associate judge of the Supreme Court, the
associate judge shall retain the designation of judge of the Superior
Court for the remainder of the term of appointment, and shall be eligible
for reappointment as a judge of the Superior Court upon expiration of
said term until such judge attains the age of seventy years.
[(c) A] (d) An associate judge of the Supreme Court who has attained
Public Act No. 26-1 49 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the age of seventy years or who ceases to be an associate judge of the
Supreme Court pursuant to subsection (c) of this section may continue
to deliberate and participate in all matters concerning the disposition of
any case which the judge heard or considered prior to attaining said age
or ceasing to be an associate judge of the Supreme Court pursuant to
said subsection (c), until such time as the decision in any such case is
officially released. The judge may also participate in the consideration
or deliberation of a motion for reconsideration [in such case if such
motion is filed within ten days of the] or any other motion submitted in
any case that the associate judge heard or considered following the
official release of such decision.
Sec. 59. Section 52-434c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
In addition to the powers and jurisdiction granted to state referees
under sections 52-434 and 52-434a, a Chief Justice or a judge of the
Supreme Court or Appellate Court, who has ceased to hold office as
justice or judge because of having retired or having ceased to hold office
pursuant to subsection (c) of section 51-198, as amended by this act, and
who has become a state referee, may be designated by the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court to be eligible to be assigned by the Chief Judge of
the Appellate Court to perform such duties of the office of judge of the
Appellate Court as may be requested by the Chief Judge. The Chief
Judge may assign no more than one state referee to sit on any one panel.
No such designation may be for a term of more than one year. In
performing the duties assigned, such retired Chief Justice or retired
judge of the Supreme Court or Appellate Court, or a judge of the
Supreme Court who has ceased to hold office pursuant to subsection (c)
of section 51-198, as amended by this act, shall exercise the same powers
and jurisdiction as does a judge of the Superior Court who is qualified
to serve as a judge on the Appellate Court.
Sec. 60. Section 7-294v of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-1 50 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) Not later than July 1, 2023, the Police Officer Standards and
Training Council shall: [(1) after]
(A) After consultation with persons with mental or physical
disabilities and advocates on behalf of such persons, develop a training
curriculum for police officers regarding interactions with persons who
have mental or physical disabilities; [,] and [(2) after]
(B) After consultation with persons who are deaf, hard of hearing or
deafblind and advocates on behalf of such persons, develop a training
curriculum for police officers regarding interactions with persons who
are deaf, hard of hearing or deafblind. On and after July 1, 2024, the
training curriculum shall include crisis intervention strategies for police
officers to use when interacting with individuals with mental illness in
crisis.
(2) Not later than March 1, 2027, the Police Officer Standards and
Training Council shall:
(A) After consultation with persons with mental or physical
disabilities, including, but not limited to, autism spectrum disorder,
cognitive impairment or nonverbal learning disorder, and advocates on
behalf of such persons, including, but not limited to, institutions of
higher education, health care professionals or advocacy organizations
that are concerned with persons with autism spectrum disorder,
cognitive impairment or nonverbal learning disorder, develop a
training curriculum for police officers regarding interactions with
persons who have mental illness or mental or physical disabilities. Such
training curriculum shall include, but need not be limited to, the
following topics: (i) The nature of mental illness and mental or physical
disabilities, including, but not limited to, autism spectrum disorder,
cognitive impairment and nonverbal learning disorder; (ii) how to
Public Act No. 26-1 51 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
identify persons with mental illness or mental or physical disabilities;
and (iii) strategies and techniques for handling incidents that involve
persons with mental illness or mental or physical disabilities, including,
but not limited to, crisis intervention strategies and deescalation
techniques; and
(B) After consultation with persons who are deaf, hard of hearing or
deafblind and advocates on behalf of such persons, develop a training
curriculum for police officers regarding interactions with persons who
are deaf, hard of hearing or deafblind.
(b) [On and after] (1) From October 1, 2023, to June 30, 2027, inclusive,
each police basic or review training program conducted or administered
by the Police Officer Standards and Training Council, the Division of
State Police within the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection or a municipal police department shall include the training
curriculum developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
this section.
(2) On and after July 1, 2027, each police basic or review training
program conducted or administered by the Police Officer Standards and
Training Council, the Division of State Police within the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection or a municipal police
department shall include the training curriculum developed pursuant
to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 61. Subsection (a) of section 4b-3 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) There is established a State Properties Review Board, which shall
consist of [six] eight members appointed as follows: (1) The speaker of
the House and president pro tempore of the Senate shall jointly appoint
three members, one of whom shall be experienced in matters relating to
Public Act No. 26-1 52 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
architecture, one experienced in building construction matters and one
in matters relating to engineering; [and] (2) the minority leader of the
House and the minority leader of the Senate shall jointly appoint three
members, one of whom shall be experienced in matters relating to the
purchase, sale and lease of real estate and buildings, one experienced in
business matters generally and one experienced in the management and
operation of state institutions; and (3) on and after July 1, 2026, the
speaker of the House and president pro tempore of the Senate shall
jointly appoint an additional member and the minority leader of the
House and the minority leader of the Senate shall jointly appoint an
additional member. No more than [three of said six] four of the members
shall be of the same political party. One of the members first appointed
by the speaker and the president pro tempore shall serve a two-year
term, one shall serve a three-year term and one shall serve a four-year
term. One of the members first appointed by the minority leaders of the
House and Senate shall serve a two-year term, one shall serve a three-
year term and one shall serve a four-year term. All appointments of
members to replace those whose terms expire and the appointments of
additional members pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection shall
be for a term of four years and until their successors have been
appointed and qualified. If any vacancy occurs on the board, the
appointing authorities having the power to make the initial
appointment under the provisions of this section shall appoint a person
for the unexpired term in accordance with the provisions [hereof] of this
subsection.
Sec. 62. Section 16-256l of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) As used in this section, "provider" means a telephone or
telecommunications company providing local telephone service,
provider of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in 47 CFR
Public Act No. 26-1 53 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Section 20.3, as amended from time to time, and voice over Internet
protocol service provider, as defined in section 28-30b.
(b) On and after [January 1, 2027] July 1, 2026, each provider shall
assess against each subscriber a fee in an amount equal to five cents per
month per access line. Each fee assessed under this subsection shall be
remitted to the office of the State Treasurer for deposit into the
firefighters cancer relief account established pursuant to section 7-313h,
not later than the fifteenth day of each month. No part of any fee
assessed under this subsection shall be subject to a refund.
(c) Not later than [November] May 1, 2026, the provider shall provide
written notice to each subscriber disclosing the amount and frequency
of such fee.
(d) The fee described in subsection (b) of this section shall not apply
to any prepaid wireless telecommunications service, as defined in
section 28-30b.
Sec. 63. Section 29-256f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
The State Building Inspector and the Codes and Standards
Committee shall, jointly, with the approval of the Commissioner of
Administrative Services, in accordance with the provisions of section 29-
252b, include in the amendments to the State Building Code next
adopted after June 6, 2024, and the State Fire Marshal and the Codes and
Standards Committee shall, in accordance with section 29-292a, include
in the amendments to the Fire Safety Code next adopted after June 6,
2024, provisions that [:
(1) Allow additional residential occupancies to be served safely by a
single exit stairway, in such a way as to:
(A) Be consistent with safe occupancy and egress;
Public Act No. 26-1 54 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(B) Consider the experience of the cities of Seattle, New York City and
Honolulu in implementing similar provisions;
(C) Apply to municipalities in which the fire service is sufficient to
maintain safe occupancy and egress under such additional occupancies,
if appropriate;
(D) Promote the inclusion of units with three or more bedrooms in
building designs to promote construction of family-sized units,
especially on smaller lots; and
(E) Allow additional stories above grade plane to be served by a
single exit stairway in a building with an automatic sprinkler system,
under such conditions as to ensure safe occupancy and egress. Such
conditions may include, but need not be limited to, additional levels of
fire and smoke separation and any features necessary to allow for
firefighters to ascend a stair as occupants descend; and
(2) Encourage] encourage construction of safe three-unit and four-
unit residential buildings, which shall:
[(A)] (1) Be consistent with safe occupancy and egress; and
[(B)] (2) Include three-unit and four-unit residential buildings in the
International Residential Code portion of the Connecticut State Building
Code, or otherwise provide for requirements for three-unit and four-
unit residential buildings in the International Building Code portion of
the Connecticut State Building Code similar to those for one-unit and
two-unit residential buildings in the International Residential Code
portion of the Connecticut State Building Code, under such conditions
as to ensure safe occupancy and egress.
Sec. 64. Subdivision (1) of subsection (h) of section 17b-340 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-1 55 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(h) (1) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1993, any intermediate care
facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities with an operating
cost component of its rate in excess of one hundred forty per cent of the
median of operating cost components of rates in effect January 1, 1992,
shall not receive an operating cost component increase. For the fiscal
year ending June 30, 1993, any intermediate care facility for individuals
with intellectual disabilities with an operating cost component of its rate
that is less than one hundred forty per cent of the median of operating
cost components of rates in effect January 1, 1992, shall have an
allowance for real wage growth equal to thirty per cent of the increase
determined in accordance with subsection (q) of section 17-311-52 of the
regulations of Connecticut state agencies, provided such operating cost
component shall not exceed one hundred forty per cent of the median
of operating cost components in effect January 1, 1992. Any facility with
real property other than land placed in service prior to October 1, 1991,
shall, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1995, receive a rate of return on
real property equal to the average of the rates of return applied to real
property other than land placed in service for the five years preceding
October 1, 1993. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any
succeeding fiscal year, the rate of return on real property for property
items shall be revised every five years. The commissioner shall, upon
submission of a request, allow actual debt service, comprised of
principal and interest, in excess of property costs allowed pursuant to
section 17-311-52 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies,
provided such debt service terms and amounts are reasonable in
relation to the useful life and the base value of the property. For the fiscal
year ending June 30, 1995, and any succeeding fiscal year, the inflation
adjustment made in accordance with subsection (p) of section 17-311-52
of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies shall not be applied to
real property costs. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any
succeeding fiscal year, the allowance for real wage growth, as
determined in accordance with subsection (q) of section 17-311-52 of the
regulations of Connecticut state agencies, shall not be applied. For the
Public Act No. 26-1 56 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any succeeding fiscal year, no rate
shall exceed three hundred seventy-five dollars per day unless the
commissioner, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Developmental Services, determines after a review of program and
management costs, that a rate in excess of this amount is necessary for
care and treatment of facility residents. For the fiscal year ending June
30, 2002, rate period, the Commissioner of Social Services shall increase
the inflation adjustment for rates made in accordance with subsection
(p) of section 17-311-52 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies
to update allowable fiscal year 2000 costs to include a three and one-half
per cent inflation factor. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, rate
period, the commissioner shall increase the inflation adjustment for
rates made in accordance with subsection (p) of section 17-311-52 of the
regulations of Connecticut state agencies to update allowable fiscal year
2001 costs to include a one and one-half per cent inflation factor, except
that such increase shall be effective November 1, 2002, and such facility
rate in effect for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, shall be paid for
services provided until October 31, 2002, except any facility that would
have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2002, than for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2002, due to interim rate status or agreement with
the department shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1, 2002, and
have such rate updated effective November 1, 2002, in accordance with
applicable statutes and regulations. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2004, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2003, shall remain in
effect, except any facility that would have been issued a lower rate
effective July 1, 2003, than for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, due
to interim rate status or agreement with the department shall be issued
such lower rate effective July 1, 2003. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2005, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2004, shall remain in
effect until September 30, 2004. Effective October 1, 2004, each facility
shall receive a rate that is five per cent greater than the rate in effect
September 30, 2004. Effective upon receipt of all the necessary federal
approvals to secure federal financial participation matching funds
Public Act No. 26-1 57 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
associated with the rate increase provided in subdivision (4) of
subsection (f) of this section, but in no event earlier than October 1, 2005,
and provided the user fee imposed under section 17b-320 is required to
be collected, each facility shall receive a rate that is four per cent more
than the rate the facility received in the prior fiscal year, except any
facility that would have been issued a lower rate effective October 1,
2005, than for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, due to interim rate
status or agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate
effective October 1, 2005. Such rate increase shall remain in effect unless:
(A) The federal financial participation matching funds associated with
the rate increase are no longer available; or (B) the user fee created
pursuant to section 17b-320 is not in effect. For the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2006, shall
remain in effect until September 30, 2006, except any facility that would
have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2006, than for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, due to interim rate status or agreement with
the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1, 2006.
Effective October 1, 2006, no facility shall receive a rate that is more than
three per cent greater than the rate in effect for the facility on September
30, 2006, except any facility that would have been issued a lower rate
effective October 1, 2006, due to interim rate status or agreement with
the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective October 1, 2006.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, each facility shall receive a rate
that is two and nine-tenths per cent greater than the rate in effect for the
period ending June 30, 2007, except any facility that would have been
issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2007, than for the rate period ending
June 30, 2007, due to interim rate status, or agreement with the
department, shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1, 2007. For the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, rates in effect for the period ending June
30, 2008, shall remain in effect until June 30, 2009, except any facility that
would have been issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2009, due to interim rate status or agreement with the department, shall
be issued such lower rate. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2010, and
Public Act No. 26-1 58 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
June 30, 2011, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2009, shall
remain in effect until June 30, 2011, except any facility that would have
been issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, or the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, due to interim rate status or agreement
with the department, shall be issued such lower rate. For the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2012, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2011,
shall remain in effect until June 30, 2012, except any facility that would
have been issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012,
due to interim rate status or agreement with the department, shall be
issued such lower rate. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2014, and
June 30, 2015, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the period ending
June 30, 2013, except the rate paid to a facility may be higher than the
rate paid to the facility for the period ending June 30, 2013, if a capital
improvement approved by the Department of Developmental Services,
in consultation with the Department of Social Services, for the health or
safety of the residents was made to the facility during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2014, or June 30, 2015, to the extent such rate increases
are within available appropriations. Any facility that would have been
issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014, or the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2015, due to interim rate status or agreement with
the department, shall be issued such lower rate. For the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2016, and June 30, 2017, rates shall not exceed those in
effect for the period ending June 30, 2015, except the rate paid to a
facility may be higher than the rate paid to the facility for the period
ending June 30, 2015, if a capital improvement approved by the
Department of Developmental Services, in consultation with the
Department of Social Services, for the health or safety of the residents
was made to the facility during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, or
June 30, 2017, to the extent such rate increases are within available
appropriations. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2016, and June 30,
2017, and each succeeding fiscal year, any facility that would have been
issued a lower rate, due to interim rate status, a change in allowable fair
rent or agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate.
Public Act No. 26-1 59 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2018, and June 30, 2019, rates shall
not exceed those in effect for the period ending June 30, 2017, except the
rate paid to a facility may be higher than the rate paid to the facility for
the period ending June 30, 2017, if a capital improvement approved by
the Department of Developmental Services, in consultation with the
Department of Social Services, for the health or safety of the residents
was made to the facility during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, or
June 30, 2019, only to the extent such rate increases are within available
appropriations. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2020, and June 30,
2021, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2019, except the rate paid to a facility may be higher than the rate
paid to the facility for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, if a capital
improvement approved by the Department of Developmental Services,
in consultation with the Department of Social Services, for the health or
safety of the residents was made to the facility during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2020, or June 30, 2021, only to the extent such rate
increases are within available appropriations. For the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2022, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2021, except the commissioner may, in the
commissioner's discretion and within available appropriations, provide
pro rata fair rent increases to facilities that have documented fair rent
additions placed in service in the cost report year ending September 30,
2020, that are not otherwise included in rates issued. For the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2023, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2022, except the commissioner may, in the
commissioner's discretion and within available appropriations, provide
pro rata fair rent increases to facilities which have documented fair rent
additions placed in service in the cost report year ending September 30,
2021, that are not otherwise included in rates issued. For the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023, a facility may receive a rate
increase for a capital improvement approved by the Department of
Developmental Services, in consultation with the Department of Social
Services, for the health or safety of the residents during the fiscal year
Public Act No. 26-1 60 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
ending June 30, 2022, or June 30, 2023, only to the extent such rate
increases are within available appropriations. There shall be no increase
to rates based on inflation or any inflationary factor for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of this chapter, any subsequent increase to allowable
operating costs, excluding fair rent, shall be inflated by the gross
domestic product deflator when funding is specifically appropriated for
such purposes in the enacted budget. The rate of inflation shall be
computed by comparing the most recent rate year to the average of the
gross domestic product deflator for the previous four fiscal quarters
ending March thirty-first. Any increase to rates based on inflation shall
be applied prior to the application of any other budget adjustment
factors that may impact such rates. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2024, the department shall determine facility rates based upon 2022 cost
report filings subject to the provisions of this section, adjusted to reflect
any rate increases provided after the cost report year ending June 30,
2022, and with the addition of a two per cent adjustment factor. No
facility shall receive a rate less than the rate in effect for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2023. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, the
minimum per diem, per bed rate shall remain at five hundred one
dollars for a residential facility licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 and
certified to participate in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an
intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disability.
There shall be no increase to rates based on any inflationary factor for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2024, and each subsequent fiscal year, the commissioner may, in the
commissioner's discretion and within available appropriations, provide
pro rata fair rent increases to facilities that have documented fair rent
additions placed in service in the cost report years that are not otherwise
included in rates issued. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the
department shall determine facility rates based upon 2023 cost report
filings subject to the provisions of this section, adjusted to reflect any
rate increases provided after the cost report ending June 30, 2023. A
Public Act No. 26-1 61 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
facility may receive a rate that is less than the rate in effect for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2024, but shall not receive a rate less than the
minimum per diem, per bed rate. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, the minimum per diem, per bed rate shall remain at five hundred
one dollars for a residential facility licensed pursuant to section 17a-227
and certified to participate in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an
intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disability.
There shall be no increase to rates based on any inflationary factor for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the department shall determine facility rates based upon 2024 cost
report filings subject to the provisions of this section, adjusted to reflect
any rate increases provided after the cost report ending June 30, 2024.
Additionally, the facility shall receive a rate that is [one] three and four-
tenths per cent greater than the calculated rate, except that any facility
that would have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2025, due to
interim rate status, or agreement with the department, shall be issued
such lower rate effective July 1, 2025. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, there shall be no minimum per diem, per bed rate for a residential
facility licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 and certified to participate
in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an intermediate care facility for
individuals with intellectual disability. There shall be no increase to
rates based on any inflationary factor for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each facility shall receive
a rate that is [two] five and eight-tenths per cent greater than the rate in
effect for the period ending June 30, 2026, except that any facility that
would have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2026, than the rate
for the period ending June 30, 2027, due to interim rate status, or
agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective
July 1, 2026. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, each facility shall
receive a rate that is [three] six and three-tenths per cent greater than the
rate in effect for the period ending June 30, 2027, except that any facility
that would have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2027, than the
rate for the period ending June 30, 2027, due to interim rate status, or
Public Act No. 26-1 62 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective
July 1, 2027. Effective January 1, 2028, each facility shall receive a rate
that is [three] six and three-tenths per cent greater than the rate in effect
for the period ending December 31, 2027, except that any facility that
would have been issued a lower rate effective January 1, 2028, than the
rate for the period ending December 31, 2027, due to interim rate status,
or agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate
effective January 1, 2028. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, and
June 30, 2025, a facility may receive a rate increase for a capital
improvement approved by the Department of Developmental Services,
in consultation with the Department of Social Services, for the health or
safety of the residents during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, or
June 30, 2025, only to the extent such rate increases are within available
appropriations. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, a facility may receive a rate increase for a capital improvement
approved by the Department of Developmental Services, in consultation
with the Department of Social Services, for the health or safety of the
residents during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027,
only to the extent such rate increases are within available
appropriations. Any facility that has a significant decrease in land and
building costs shall receive a reduced rate to reflect such decrease in
land and building costs. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2012, June
30, 2013, June 30, 2014, June 30, 2015, June 30, 2016, June 30, 2017, June
30, 2018, June 30, 2019, June 30, 2020, June 30, 2021, June 30, 2022, June
30, 2023, June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
the Commissioner of Social Services may provide fair rent increases to
any facility that has undergone a material change in circumstances
related to fair rent and has an approved certificate of need pursuant to
section 17b-352, 17b-353, 17b-354 or 17b-355. The Department of Social
Services shall amend the regulations of Connecticut state agencies to
allow for the waiver of the separate inflation cost limitation on direct
care costs when rebasing rates for intermediate care facilities for
individuals with intellectual disabilities after the fiscal year ending June
Public Act No. 26-1 63 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
30, 2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the
Commissioner of Social Services may, within available appropriations,
increase or decrease rates issued to intermediate care facilities for
individuals with intellectual disabilities to reflect a reduction in
available appropriations as provided in subsection (a) of this section.
For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2014, and June 30, 2015, the
commissioner shall not consider rebasing in determining rates.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, effective July 1, 2021,
and July 1, 2022, the commissioner shall, within available
appropriations, increase rates for the purpose of wage and benefit
enhancements for employees of intermediate care facilities. Facilities
that receive a rate adjustment for the purpose of wage and benefit
enhancements but do not provide increases in employee salaries as
described in this subsection on or before July 31, 2021, and July 31, 2022,
respectively, may be subject to a rate decrease in the same amount as the
adjustment by the commissioner.
Sec. 65. Subdivision (12) of subsection (a) of section 19a-638 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(12) An increase in the licensed bed capacity of a health care facility,
except as provided in [subdivision] subdivisions (23) and (26) of
subsection (b) of this section;
Sec. 66. Subsection (b) of section 19a-638 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) A certificate of need shall not be required for:
(1) Health care facilities owned and operated by the federal
government;
(2) The establishment of offices by a licensed private practitioner,
Public Act No. 26-1 64 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
whether for individual or group practice, except when a certificate of
need is required in accordance with the requirements of section 19a-
493b or subdivision (3), (10) or (11) of subsection (a) of this section;
(3) A health care facility operated by a religious group that
exclusively relies upon spiritual means through prayer for healing;
(4) Residential care homes, as defined in subsection (c) of section 19a-
490, and nursing homes and rest homes, as defined in subsection (o) of
section 19a-490;
(5) An assisted living services agency, as defined in section 19a-490;
(6) Home health agencies, as defined in section 19a-490;
(7) Hospice services, as described in section 19a-122b;
(8) Outpatient rehabilitation facilities;
(9) Outpatient chronic dialysis services;
(10) Transplant services;
(11) Free clinics, as defined in section 19a-630;
(12) School-based health centers and expanded school health sites, as
such terms are defined in section 19a-6r, community health centers, as
defined in section 19a-490a, not-for-profit outpatient clinics licensed in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 368v and federally qualified
health centers;
(13) A program licensed or funded by the Department of Children
and Families, provided such program is not a psychiatric residential
treatment facility;
(14) Any nonprofit facility, institution or provider that has a contract
with, or is certified or licensed to provide a service for, a state agency or
Public Act No. 26-1 65 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
department for a service that would otherwise require a certificate of
need. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to a short-term
acute care general hospital or children's hospital, or a hospital or other
facility or institution operated by the state that provides services that are
eligible for reimbursement under Title XVIII or XIX of the federal Social
Security Act, 42 USC 301, as amended;
(15) A health care facility operated by a nonprofit educational
institution exclusively for students, faculty and staff of such institution
and their dependents;
(16) An outpatient clinic or program operated exclusively by or
contracted to be operated exclusively by a municipality, municipal
agency, municipal board of education or a health district, as described
in section 19a-241;
(17) A residential facility for persons with intellectual disability
licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 and certified to participate in the
Title XIX Medicaid program as an intermediate care facility for
individuals with intellectual disabilities;
(18) Replacement of existing computed tomography scanners,
magnetic resonance imaging scanners, positron emission tomography
scanners, positron emission tomography-computed tomography
scanners, or nonhospital based linear accelerators, if such equipment
was acquired through certificate of need approval or a certificate of need
determination, provided a health care facility, provider, physician or
person notifies the unit of the date on which the equipment is replaced
and the disposition of the replaced equipment, including if a
replacement scanner has dual modalities or functionalities and the
applicant already offers similar imaging services for each of the
equipment's modalities or functionalities that will be utilized;
(19) Acquisition of cone-beam dental imaging equipment that is to be
Public Act No. 26-1 66 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
used exclusively by a dentist licensed pursuant to chapter 379;
(20) The partial or total elimination of services provided by an
outpatient surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-493b, except as
provided in subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this section and section
19a-639e;
(21) The termination of services for which the Department of Public
Health has requested the facility to relinquish its license;
(22) Acquisition of any equipment by any person that is to be used
exclusively for scientific research that is not conducted on humans;
(23) On or before June 30, 2026, an increase in the licensed bed
capacity of a mental health facility, provided (A) the mental health
facility demonstrates to the unit, in a form and manner prescribed by
the unit, that it accepts reimbursement for any covered benefit provided
to a covered individual under: (i) An individual or group health
insurance policy providing coverage of the type specified in
subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11) and (12) of section 38a-469; (ii) a self-
insured employee welfare benefit plan established pursuant to the
federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended
from time to time; or (iii) HUSKY Health, as defined in section 17b-290,
and (B) if the mental health facility does not accept or stops accepting
reimbursement for any covered benefit provided to a covered
individual under a policy, plan or program described in clause (i), (ii) or
(iii) of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, a certificate of need for such
increase in the licensed bed capacity shall be required; [.]
(24) The establishment at harm reduction centers through the pilot
program established pursuant to section 17a-673c; [or]
(25) On or before June 30, 2028, a birth center, as defined in section
19a-490, that is enrolled as a provider in the Connecticut medical
assistance program, as defined in section 17b-245g; or
Public Act No. 26-1 67 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(26) On or before June 30, 2026, an increase in the licensed bed
capacity of a hospital owned or operated by the state, provided all such
added licensed beds are dedicated to inpatient behavioral health
services and, if any of such added licensed beds are converted to any
other inpatient service, a certificate of need for such increase in the
licensed bed capacity shall be required.
Sec. 67. Subsection (d) of section 52-362d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) Whenever an order of the Superior Court or a family support
magistrate of this state, or an order of another state that has been
registered in this state, for support of a minor child or children is issued
and such payments have been ordered through the IV-D agency, or
when a request from another state for assistance enforcing an order that
has not been registered in this state is received by the IV-D agency and
such request meets the requirements of 42 USC 666(a)(14), and the
obligor against whom such support order was issued owes overdue
support under such order in the amount of five hundred dollars or
more, the IV-D agency, as defined in subdivision (12) of subsection (b)
of section 46b-231, or Support Enforcement Services of the Superior
Court may notify (1) any state or local agency or officer with authority
(A) to hold assets or property for such obligor including, but not limited
to, any property unclaimed or presumed abandoned under part III of
chapter 32, or (B) to distribute benefits to such obligor including, but not
limited to, unemployment compensation and workers' compensation,
(2) any person having or expecting to have custody or control of or
authority to distribute any amounts due such obligor under any
judgment or settlement, (3) any financial institution holding assets of
such obligor, and (4) any public or private entity administering a public
or private retirement fund in which such obligor has an interest that
such obligor owes overdue support in a IV-D support case. Upon receipt
Public Act No. 26-1 68 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
of such notice, such agency, officer, person, institution or entity shall
withhold delivery or distribution of any such property, benefits,
amounts, assets or funds until receipt of further notice from the IV-D
agency.
Sec. 68. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 46b-215e of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, whenever
a child support obligor is institutionalized or incarcerated, the Superior
Court or a family support magistrate shall establish an initial order for
current support, or modify an existing order for current support, upon
proper motion, based upon the obligor's present income and substantial
assets, if any, in accordance with the child support guidelines
established pursuant to section 46b-215a. [Downward modification of
an existing support order based solely on a loss of income due to
incarceration or institutionalization shall not be granted in the case of a
child support obligor who is incarcerated or institutionalized for an
offense against the custodial party or the child subject to such support
order.]
(b) In IV-D support cases, as defined in section 46b-231, when the
child support obligor is institutionalized or incarcerated for more than
ninety days, any existing support order, as defined in section 46b-231,
shall be modified to zero dollars effective upon the date that a support
enforcement officer files an affidavit in the Family Support Magistrate
Division. The affidavit shall include: (1) The beginning and expected
end dates of such obligor's institutionalization or incarceration; and (2)
a statement by such officer that (A) a diligent search failed to identify
any income or assets that could be used to satisfy the child support order
while the obligor is incarcerated or institutionalized, [(B) the offense for
which the obligor is institutionalized or incarcerated was not an offense
against the custodial party or the child subject to such support order,]
Public Act No. 26-1 69 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
and [(C)] (B) a notice in accordance with subsection (c) of this section
was provided to the custodial party and an objection form was not
received from such party.
(c) Prior to filing an affidavit under subsection (b) of this section, the
support enforcement officer shall provide notice to the custodial party
in accordance with section 52-57 or by certified mail, return receipt
requested. The notice shall state in clear and simple language that: (1)
Such child support order shall be modified unless the custodial party
objects not later than fifteen calendar days after receipt of such notice on
the grounds that [(A)] the obligor has sufficient income or assets to
comply with the support order; [, or (B) the obligor is incarcerated or
institutionalized for an offense against the custodial party or the child
subject to such support order;] and (2) the custodial party may object to
the proposed modification by delivering a signed objection form, or
other written notice or motion, indicating the nature of the objection or
grounds of the motion, to the support enforcement officer not later than
fifteen calendar days after receipt of such notice. Upon receipt of any
objection or motion, the support enforcement officer shall promptly
arrange with the clerk of the Family Support Magistrate Division to
enter the appearance of the custodial party, set the matter for a hearing,
send a file-stamped copy of the objection or motion to the IV-D agency
of the state to whom the support order is payable, and notify all parties
of the hearing date set. The court or family support magistrate shall
promptly hear the objection or motion and determine whether the child
support order should be modified in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section.
Sec. 69. Section 9-163aa of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) (1) (A) Any eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a regular
election, in accordance with the provisions of this section, during a
Public Act No. 26-1 70 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
period of early voting at each regular election held on or after April 1,
2024.
(B) The period of early voting under subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision shall (i) notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-2,
commence on the fifteenth day prior to and conclude on the second day
prior to such regular election, and (ii) consist of such days between and
inclusive of such commencement and conclusion, except any legal
holiday designated, appointed or recommended under section 1-4, and
at such times as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section
9-174.
(2) (A) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (4) of this subsection,
any eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a primary, other than a
presidential preference primary, in accordance with the provisions of
this section, during a period of early voting at each primary, other than
a presidential preference primary, held on or after April 1, 2024.
(B) The period of early voting under subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision shall (i) notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-2,
commence on the eighth day prior to and conclude on the second day
prior to such primary, other than a presidential preference primary, and
(ii) consist of such days between and inclusive of such commencement
and conclusion, except any legal holiday designated, appointed or
recommended under section 1-4, and at such times as provided in
subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-174.
(3) (A) Any eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a special
election, in accordance with the provisions of this section, during a
period of early voting at each special election held on or after April 1,
2024.
(B) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (4) of this subsection, any
eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a presidential preference
Public Act No. 26-1 71 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
primary, in accordance with the provisions of this section, during a
period of early voting at each presidential preference primary held on
or after April 1, 2024.
(C) The period of early voting under subparagraph (A) or (B) of this
subdivision shall (i) notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-2,
commence on the fifth day prior to and conclude on the second day
prior to such special election or such presidential preference primary,
except that such commencing and concluding days shall be adjusted to
exclude from such period April 20, 2025, and any legal holiday
designated, appointed or recommended under section 1-4, and (ii)
consist of four total days between and inclusive of such commencement
and conclusion, as may be adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (C)(i) of
this subdivision, and at such times as provided in subdivision (2) of
subsection (c) of section 9-174.
(4) (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 9-19e, 9-23a, 9-26,
9-31a, 9-55, 9-56, as amended by this act, and 9-57:
(i) In the case of an unaffiliated elector who wishes to vote during the
period of early voting at a primary, such elector shall be eligible to so
vote if such elector's application for enrollment with the political party
holding such primary is filed with the registrars of voters by twelve
o'clock noon on the business day immediately preceding the day on
which such period of early voting commences.
(ii) In the case of a person who is not admitted as an elector and who
wishes to vote during the period of early voting at a primary, such
person shall be eligible to so vote if such person's application for
admission as an elector and enrollment with the political party holding
such primary is filed with the registrars of voters by twelve o'clock noon
on the business day immediately preceding the day during such period
of early voting on which such person offers to vote at such primary.
Public Act No. 26-1 72 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an individual
who enrolls in a political party during a period of early voting at a
primary from voting by absentee ballot, if eligible, or in person on the
day of such primary.
(b) (1) (A) The registrars of voters of each municipality shall designate
a location for the conduct of early voting [, which] but, if the registrars
fail to agree as to such location, the legislative body or, in a municipality
where the legislative body is a town meeting, the board of selectmen,
shall designate such location. Such location shall be the same for the
duration of the period of early voting except as otherwise specified in
this subdivision, provided [(A)] (i) the registrars of voters have access to
the state-wide centralized voter registration system from such location,
and [(B)] (ii) such location is certified in writing to the Secretary of the
State. [not later than sixty days prior to the day of an election or a
primary.] The written certification under subparagraph [(B)] (A)(ii) of
this subdivision shall be submitted annually by the registrars of voters
to the Secretary not later than February fifteenth, except that for an
election or a primary held in 2026, such written certification shall be so
submitted not later than sixty days prior to the day of such election or
primary. Any change to such written certification shall be made and
submitted, and approved or disapproved, in accordance with the
provisions of subparagraph (B) of this subdivision. Such written
certification shall provide [(i)] (I) the name, street address and relevant
contact information associated with such location, [(ii)] (II) the number
of election or primary officials to be appointed by the registrars of voters
to serve at such location and the roles of such officials, and [(iii)] (III) a
description of the design of such location and a plan for effective
conduct of such early voting, and shall include the information required
for same-day election registration under subdivision (1) of subsection
(c) of section 9-19j, as amended by this act. The Secretary shall approve
or disapprove such written certification annually not later than [forty-
five days prior to the day of an election or a primary] March first, except
Public Act No. 26-1 73 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
that for an election or a primary held in 2026, the Secretary shall so
approve or disapprove not later than forty-five days prior to the day of
such election or primary. If the Secretary disapproves such certification,
the Secretary shall provide, in writing, the reasons for such disapproval
and shall issue an order for such corrective action as the Secretary deems
necessary, including, but not limited to, the appointment of additional
election or primary officials or the alteration of such design or plan.
After having received approval of such certification or having complied
with any order for corrective action to the Secretary's satisfaction, as
applicable, the registrars of voters shall determine the site of such
location designated for the conduct of early voting at least thirty-one
days prior to an election or a primary. Such location shall not be changed
within such period, except, if the municipal clerk and registrars of voters
unanimously find that such location has been rendered unusable within
such period, such clerk and registrars shall forthwith designate another
location for the conduct of early voting to be used in place of the location
so rendered unusable and shall give adequate notice that such location
has been so changed. The provisions of sections 9-168d and 9-168e shall
apply to such location designated for the conduct of early voting.
(B) If, after the registrars of voters annually submit the written
certification under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, the registrars
make any change to any part of such written certification, such registrars
shall submit to the Secretary of the State an updated written
certification, in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary, as soon
as practicable but in no case later than seven days after such change. The
registrars shall clearly indicate on such updated written certification the
information that has changed since the prior submission. The Secretary
shall approve or disapprove such updated written certification as soon
as practicable but in no case later than seven days after submission
thereof. If the Secretary disapproves such updated certification, the
Secretary shall provide, in writing, the reasons for such disapproval and
shall issue an order for such corrective action as the Secretary deems
Public Act No. 26-1 74 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
necessary, in accordance with subparagraph (A) of this subdivision.
(2) In any municipality with a population of at least twenty thousand,
the legislative body may hold a public hearing on whether to designate
any additional location in such municipality for the conduct of early
voting, which public hearing, if any, shall be held not later than fifteen
days prior to the time for designating any such location set forth in
subdivision (1) of this subsection. Any legislative body holding such a
public hearing shall properly notice such public hearing not later than
ten days prior to such public hearing in a newspaper having general
circulation in such municipality and on the Internet web site of the
municipality. For any such municipality in which such a public hearing
was not held, the legislative body thereof shall determine whether to
designate any such additional location and shall notify the Secretary of
the State with a detailed explanation for such determination. For any
municipality in which such a public hearing was held, not later than
three days after the conclusion of such public hearing, the legislative
body thereof shall determine whether to designate any such additional
location and shall notify the Secretary with a detailed explanation for
such determination. If the legislative body determines that any such
additional location be designated, the [registrars of voters] legislative
body or, in a municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting,
the board of selectmen, shall so designate such additional location and
the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to such
additional location. The Secretary shall take no action on any detailed
explanation submitted under this subdivision with regard to the
number of additional locations designated in such a municipality, and
shall preserve each such detailed explanation as a public record open to
public inspection. For the purposes of this subdivision, "population"
means the estimated number of people according to the most recent
version of the State Register and Manual prepared pursuant to section
3-90.
Public Act No. 26-1 75 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(3) In any municipality containing any campus of a constituent unit,
as defined in section 10a-1, with at least one thousand students living in
housing that is on such campus or is owned or operated by, or affiliated
with, such constituent unit, the registrars of voters of such municipality
shall designate an additional location on such campus for the conduct
of early voting and the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall apply to such additional location.
(4) At each location designated for the conduct of early voting, the
registrars of voters shall provide to prospective electors during the early
voting period the opportunity to apply for same-day election
registration, in accordance with the procedures set forth in section 9-19j,
as amended by this act, for such application and for the completion and
processing of any such application.
(5) (A) The registrars of voters shall appoint, for each day on which
early voting is conducted, a moderator and such other election or
primary officials to serve at each location designated for such conduct.
The moderator so appointed shall perform any duty required, and may
exercise any power authorized, under this title related to the conduct of
early voting at such location. On any such day and solely for purposes
related to the conduct of early voting, the registrars of voters of a
municipality may, upon agreement, appoint one of the registrars from
such municipality as moderator in accordance with the provisions of
subparagraph (B) of this subdivision. The registrars of voters may
delegate to each other election or primary official so appointed any of
the responsibilities assigned to the registrars of voters. The registrars of
voters shall supervise each such official and train each such official to be
an early voting election or primary official.
(B) Whenever the registrars of voters of a municipality appoint,
pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, one of the registrars
of such municipality as moderator to serve at a location designated for
the conduct of early voting, such registrars of voters shall jointly submit
Public Act No. 26-1 76 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
to the Secretary of the State (i) a certification that the registrars of voters
of such municipality are in agreement as to such appointment, and (ii)
a written plan detailing alternative coverage of the duties normally
carried out by the registrar so appointed to ensure that such registrar
abstains, on each day in which such registrar serves as moderator, from
any such duties that conflict with those of the moderator.
(C) Not later than the fourteenth day preceding the commencement
of the period of early voting, the registrars of voters shall provide to the
Secretary of the State a written report setting forth the name, address
and, if available, cellular mobile telephone number of the moderator
appointed to serve at each location designated for the conduct of early
voting pursuant to this subdivision. Such written report shall be
included as part of the written report provided by the registrars to the
Secretary under section 9-228a, as amended by this act.
(c) Any elector who wishes to vote during a period of early voting at
an election or primary, and is eligible to so vote at such election or
primary, shall (1) appear in person at such times as provided in
subsection (c) of section 9-174, at the location designated by the
registrars of voters for early voting, and (2) identify such elector as
required by subsection (a) of section 9-261. [, and (3) declare under oath
that such elector has not previously voted in such election or primary,
as provided in subsection (e) of this section.]
(d) If the registrars of voters determine that an elector is eligible to
vote in the election or primary, the registrars of voters shall check the
state-wide centralized voter registration system before allowing such
elector to cast an early voting ballot as provided in subsection (e) of this
section.
(1) If the registrars of voters determine that the elector has not already
voted, or if there is no report that the elector has already voted, the
registrars shall allow such elector to vote.
Public Act No. 26-1 77 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(2) If the registrars of voters believe that the elector may have already
voted, such matter shall be reviewed by the registrars of voters. After
completion of such review, if a resolution of the matter cannot be made
and such elector claims to have neither in fact voted nor offered to vote
in person or by absentee ballot, such elector may request a challenged
ballot in accordance with section 9-232d and may cast such challenged
ballot in accordance with section 9-232e. Such matter shall be reported
to the State Elections Enforcement Commission, which shall conduct an
investigation of the matter. The provisions of section 9-232f shall apply
to any challenged ballot cast under this subdivision.
(e) If the elector is allowed to vote, the registrars of voters shall
provide such elector with an early voting ballot, [and early voting
envelope and shall make a record of such issuance. The] shall make a
record of such issuance and shall announce to such elector the voting
district in which such elector resides and the ballot, corresponding to
such voting district, that such elector should properly receive. Prior to
marking the early voting ballot, the elector shall complete [an] a printed
affirmation [printed upon the back of the early voting envelope] in a log
book provided by the registrars of voters and shall declare under oath
that the [voter] elector has not previously voted in the election or
primary. The Secretary of the State shall prescribe the form of such log
book and shall make a sample thereof available on the Internet web site
of the office of the Secretary of the State. Such printed affirmation shall
be in the form substantially as follows and signed by the [voter] elector:
AFFIRMATION: I, the undersigned, do hereby state, under penalty
of false statement (perjury), that:
1. I am the elector appearing in person to vote early at [an] this
election or primary. [prior to the day of such election or primary.]
2. I am eligible to vote in [the] this election or primary. [indicated for
today.]
Public Act No. 26-1 78 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
3. I have identified myself to the satisfaction of the registrars of voters.
4. I have not voted in person or by absentee ballot and I will not vote
otherwise than by this ballot at this election or primary.
5. I have received an early voting ballot for the purpose of [so] voting.
…. (Signature of voter)
…. (Printed name of voter)
(f) The elector shall forthwith mark the early voting ballot in the
presence of the registrars of voters in such a manner that the registrars
of voters shall not know how the early voting ballot is marked. The
elector shall place the early voting ballot [in the early voting ballot
envelope provided and deposit such envelope in a secured early voting
ballot depository receptacle] into the voting tabulator. At the conclusion
of each day during the early voting period, the registrars of voters shall
publicly open the voting tabulator, secure and seal such day's early
voting ballots in a secure receptacle and transport such receptacle
[containing such day's early voting ballots] to the municipal clerk, who
shall retain and securely store such ballots in as near a manner as
possible to that for the retention and secure storage of absentee ballots,
as provided in subsection (g) of this section, except that, if such manner
is not practicable, then such early voting ballots shall be retained and
securely stored as provided in an alternate plan submitted by the
registrars of voters to the Secretary of the State and approved by the
Secretary. On the day of the election or primary, the early voting ballots
shall be delivered to the registrars of voters for the purpose of counting
such ballots. A section of the head moderator's return shall show the
number of early voting ballots received from electors. The registrars of
voters shall seal a copy of the vote tally for early voting ballots in a
depository envelope with the early voting ballots and store such early
voting depository envelope with the other election or primary results
Public Act No. 26-1 79 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
materials. The early voting depository envelope shall be preserved by
the registrars of voters for the period of time required to preserve
counted ballots for elections or primaries.
(g) Except as provided in section 9-163bb, as amended by this act, the
provisions of this title and any regulation adopted under this title
concerning procedures relating to the custody, control and counting of
absentee ballots shall apply, as nearly as possible, to the custody, control
and counting of early voting ballots under this section.
(h) (1) No person shall solicit on behalf of or in opposition to any
candidate or on behalf of or in opposition to any question being
submitted at the election or primary, or loiter or peddle or offer any
advertising matter, ballot or circular to another person within a radius
of seventy-five feet of any outside entrance in use as an entry to any
building that contains any location designated by the registrars of voters
for early voting or in any corridor, passageway or other approach
leading from any such outside entrance to any such location or in any
room opening upon any such corridor, passageway or approach.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, no person
shall be allowed within any location designated by the registrars of
voters for early voting for any purpose other than casting such person's
vote, except (A) primary officials under section 9-436, (B) election
officials under section 9-258, including (i) a municipal clerk or registrar
of voters, who is a candidate for the same office, and (ii) a deputy
registrar of voters, who is a candidate for the office of registrar of voters,
performing such official's duties, and (C) unofficial checkers under
section 9-235.
(3) A person, including any candidate or any campaign or party
employee or volunteer, may be within the seventy-five-foot radius
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection (A) only for purposes
related to the performance of such person's official duties or to the
Public Act No. 26-1 80 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
conduct of government business within such radius, (B) only for as long
as necessary to perform such duties or conduct such business, and (C)
provided such person is not engaged in any conduct described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(i) The provisions of subsections (a) to (h), inclusive, of this section
shall not apply to any primary held for the purpose of choosing town
committee members.
(j) No election or primary official shall perform services for any party
or candidate on any day during the period of early voting on which such
election or primary official is appointed to serve under this section, nor
appear at any political party headquarters prior to the hour prescribed
under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (c) of section 9-174, as
applicable, for the closing of the location designated for early voting on
such day.
Sec. 70. Section 9-163bb of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) Early voting ballots received by the municipal clerk prior to the
day of an election or primary, and same-day election registration ballots
received by the municipal clerk prior to the day of a regular election,
shall be delivered by the municipal clerk to the registrars between six
o'clock a.m. and ten o'clock a.m. on the day of the election or primary.
[(b)] (2) The ballot counters for such early voting ballots and same-
day election registration ballots shall proceed to the central counting
location or to the respective polling places when counting is to take
place pursuant to subsection (b) of section 9-147a at the time, between
six o'clock a.m. and ten o'clock a.m. on the day of the election or primary,
designated by the registrars of voters. At the time such ballots are
delivered to the ballot counters pursuant to subsection (a) of this section,
the ballot counters shall perform any checking of such ballots and
Public Act No. 26-1 81 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
proceed, as nearly as possible, as provided in section 9-150a, as
amended by this act.
(b) On the first day of the early voting period, before the opening of
the polls, the moderator for the location designated for the conduct of
early voting shall unlock the voting tabulator for use and confirm that
the counter, which indicates the number of ballots that have been
inserted into the voting tabulator, is set at zero (000). Upon the close of
the polls each day during the early voting period, such moderator shall
record the number of ballots inserted into the voting tabulator, lock the
voting tabulator against voting and store the voting tabulator in
accordance with the written certification approved, or order for
corrective action issued, as applicable, by the Secretary of the State
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 9-163aa, as
amended by this act. On each subsequent day of the early voting period,
before the opening of the polls, the moderator shall unlock the voting
tabulator for use and confirm that the counter is set to the same number
that the moderator had recorded upon the close of the polls the prior
day for the number of ballots inserted into the voting tabulator. Upon
the close of the polls on the day of the election, the moderator shall cause
the vote totals for all candidates and questions to be produced by the
early voting tabulators.
Sec. 71. Section 9-19j of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Election day" means the day on which a regular election, as
defined in section 9-1, as amended by this act, is held; and
(2) "Same-day election registration" means admission as an elector
during the period of early voting at a regular election, as provided in
Public Act No. 26-1 82 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, or on election day.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, a person who (1)
is (A) not an elector, or (B) an elector registered in a municipality who
wishes to change such elector's registration to another municipality
pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of this
section, and (2) meets the eligibility requirements under subsection (a)
of section 9-12, may apply for same-day election registration pursuant
to the provisions of this section.
(c) (1) (A) The registrars of voters shall designate a location for the
completion and processing of same-day election registrations on
election day, provided [(A)] (i) the registrars of voters have access to the
state-wide centralized voter registration system from such location, and
[(B)] (ii) such location is certified in writing to the Secretary of the State.
[not later than forty-five days before election day.] The written
certification under subparagraph [(B)] (A)(ii) of this subdivision shall
[(i) include] be submitted annually by the registrars of voters to the
Secretary not later than February fifteenth as part of such registrars'
submission under subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (b)
of section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, except that for election day
in 2026, such written certification shall be so submitted not later than
forty-five days before such election day. Any change to such written
certification shall be made and submitted, and approved or
disapproved, in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (B) of
this subdivision. Such written certification shall provide (I) the name,
street address and relevant contact information associated with such
location, [(ii) list the name and address of each election official who
shall] (II) the number of election officials to be appointed by the
registrars of voters to serve at such location [, if any] and the roles of
such officials, and [(iii) provide] (III) a description of the design of such
location and a plan for effective completion and processing of [such
applications] same-day election registrations. The Secretary shall
Public Act No. 26-1 83 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
approve or disapprove such written certification annually not later than
[twenty-nine days before election day] March first, except that for
election day in 2026, the Secretary shall so approve or disapprove not
later than twenty-nine days before such election day, and may require
the registrars of voters to appoint one or more additional election
officials or alter such design or plan.
(B) If, after the registrars of voters annually submit the written
certification under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, the registrars
make any change to any part of such written certification, including for
any additional location designated pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection, such registrars shall submit to the Secretary of the State an
updated written certification, in a form and manner prescribed by the
Secretary, as soon as practicable but in no case later than seven days
after such change. The registrars shall clearly indicate on such updated
written certification the information that has changed since the prior
submission. The Secretary shall approve or disapprove such updated
written certification as soon as practicable but in no case later than seven
days after submission thereof. If the Secretary disapproves such
updated certification, the Secretary shall provide, in writing, the reasons
for such disapproval and shall issue an order for such corrective action
as the Secretary deems necessary, in accordance with subparagraph (A)
of this subdivision.
(2) The legislative body of the municipality may apply to the
Secretary of the State not later than seventy-four days before election
day, in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary, to designate any
additional location for the completion and processing of same-day
election [registration applications] registrations on election day. The
Secretary shall approve or disapprove such application not later than
fifty-nine days before election day. If the Secretary approves such
application, the registrars of voters may so designate any such
additional location. The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection
Public Act No. 26-1 84 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
shall apply to any such additional location.
(3) (A) The registrars of voters shall appoint, for each day on which
same-day election registrations are completed and processed, a
moderator and such other election officials to serve at each location
designated for such completion and processing. The moderator so
appointed shall perform any duty required, and may exercise any
power authorized, under this title related to the completion and
processing of same-day election registrations at such location. On any
such day and solely for purposes related to the completion and
processing of same-day election registrations, the registrars of voters of
a municipality may, upon agreement, appoint one of the registrars from
such municipality as moderator in accordance with the provisions of
subparagraph (B) of this subdivision. The registrars of voters may
delegate to each other election official so appointed [pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection] any of the responsibilities assigned to
the registrars of voters. The registrars of voters shall supervise each such
election official and train each such official to be a same-day election
registration election official.
(B) Whenever the registrars of voters of a municipality appoint,
pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, one of the registrars
of such municipality as moderator to serve at a location designated for
the completion and processing of same-day election registrations, such
registrars of voters shall jointly submit to the Secretary of the State (i) a
certification that the registrars of voters of such municipality are in
agreement as to such appointment, and (ii) a written plan detailing
alternative coverage of the duties normally carried out by the registrar
so appointed to ensure that such registrar abstains, on each day in which
such registrar serves as moderator, from any such duties that conflict
with those of the moderator.
(C) Not later than the fourteenth day preceding the commencement
of the period of early voting prior to election day, the registrars of voters
Public Act No. 26-1 85 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
shall provide to the Secretary of the State a written report setting forth
the name, address and, if available, cellular mobile telephone number of
the moderator appointed to serve at each location designated for the
completion and processing of same-day election registrations pursuant
to this subdivision. Such written report shall be included as part of the
written report provided by the registrars to the Secretary under section
9-228a, as amended by this act.
(d) Any person applying for same-day election registration under the
provisions of this section shall make application in accordance with the
provisions of section 9-20, provided (1) (A) on election day, the applicant
shall appear in person not later than eight o'clock p.m., in accordance
with subsection (b) of section 9-174, at the location designated by the
registrars of voters for same-day election registration, and (B) during the
period of early voting prior to election day, the applicant shall appear
in person at such times as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (c)
of section 9-174, at such location, (2) an applicant who is a student
enrolled at an institution of higher education may submit a current
photo identification card issued by such institution in lieu of the
identification required by section 9-20, and (3) the applicant shall
declare under oath that the applicant has not previously voted in the
election, as provided in subsection (f) of this section. If the information
that the applicant is required to provide under section 9-20 and this
section does not include proof of the applicant's residential address, the
applicant shall also [(i)] (A) submit identification that shows the
applicant's bona fide residence address, including, but not limited to, a
learner's permit issued under section 14-36 or a utility bill that has the
applicant's name and current address and that has a due date that is not
later than thirty days after the election or, in the case of a student
enrolled at an institution of higher education, a registration or fee
statement from such institution that has the applicant's name and
current address, or [(ii)] (B) prove the applicant's bona fide residence
address by the testimony under oath of at least one elector.
Public Act No. 26-1 86 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(e) If the registrars of voters determine that an applicant satisfies the
application requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this section, the
registrars of voters shall check the state-wide centralized voter
registration system before admitting such applicant as an elector.
(1) If the registrars of voters determine that the applicant is not
already an elector, the registrars of voters shall admit the applicant as
an elector and the privileges of an elector shall attach immediately.
(2) If the registrars of voters determine that such applicant is an
elector in another municipality and such applicant wants to change the
municipality in which the applicant is an elector, notwithstanding the
provisions of section 9-21, the registrars of voters of the municipality in
which such elector now seeks to register shall immediately notify the
registrars of voters in such other municipality that such elector is
changing the municipality in which the applicant is an elector. The
registrars of voters in such other municipality shall notify the election
officials in such municipality to remove such elector from the official
voter list of such municipality. Such election officials shall cross through
the elector's name on such official voter list and mark "off" next to such
elector's name on such official voter list.
(A) If it is reported that such applicant already voted in such other
municipality, the registrars of voters of such other municipality shall
immediately notify the registrars of voters of the municipality in which
such elector now seeks to register. In such event, such elector shall not
receive a same-day election registration ballot from the registrars of
voters of the municipality in which such elector now seeks to register.
For any such elector, the same-day election registration process shall
cease in the municipality in which such elector now seeks to register and
such matter shall be reviewed by the registrars of voters in the
municipality in which such elector now seeks to register. After
completion of such review, if a resolution of the matter cannot be made,
such matter shall be reported to the State Elections Enforcement
Public Act No. 26-1 87 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Commission which shall conduct an investigation of the matter.
(B) If there is no such report that such applicant already voted in the
other municipality, the registrars of voters of the municipality in which
the applicant seeks to register shall admit the applicant as an elector and
the privileges of an elector shall attach immediately.
(f) If the applicant is admitted as an elector, the registrars of voters
shall provide the elector with a same-day election registration ballot and
same-day election registration envelope and shall make a record of such
issuance. The elector shall complete an affirmation imprinted upon the
back of the same-day election registration envelope and shall declare
under oath that the applicant has not previously voted in the election.
The affirmation shall be in the form substantially as follows and signed
by the [voter] elector:
AFFIRMATION: I, the undersigned, do hereby state, under penalty
of false statement, (perjury) that:
1. I am the person admitted here as an elector in the town indicated.
2. I am eligible to vote in the election indicated for today in the town
indicated.
3. The information on my voter registration card is correct and
complete.
4. I reside at the address that I have given to the registrars of voters.
5. If previously registered at another location, I have provided such
address to the registrars of voters and hereby request cancellation of
such prior registration.
6. I have not voted in person or by absentee ballot and I will not vote
otherwise than by this ballot at this election.
Public Act No. 26-1 88 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
7. I completed an application for a same-day election registration
ballot and received a same-day election registration ballot.
.... (Signature of voter)
…. (Printed name of voter)
(g) The elector shall forthwith mark the same-day election
registration ballot in the presence of the registrars of voters in such a
manner that the registrars of voters shall not know how the same-day
election registration ballot is marked. The elector shall place the same-
day election registration ballot in the same-day election registration
ballot envelope provided, and deposit such envelope in a secured same-
day election registration ballot depository receptacle. At the conclusion
of each day during the early voting period, the registrars of voters shall
transport such receptacle containing such day's same-day election
registration ballots to the municipal clerk, who shall retain and securely
store such ballots in as near a manner as possible to that for the retention
and secure storage of absentee ballots, as provided in subsection (h) of
this section, except that, if such manner is not practicable, such same-
day election registration ballots shall be retained and securely stored as
provided in an alternate plan submitted by the registrars of voters to the
Secretary of the State and approved by the Secretary. On election day,
the previously retained and securely stored same-day election
registration ballots shall be delivered to the registrars of voters and, at
the time designated by the registrars of voters and noticed to election
officials, the registrars of voters shall transport such receptacle
containing the same-day election registration ballots received on such
election day to the central location or polling place, pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 9-147a, where absentee ballots are counted and
such same-day election registration ballots shall be counted by the
election officials present at such central location or polling place. A
section of the head moderator's return shall show the number of same-
day election registration ballots received from electors. The registrars of
Public Act No. 26-1 89 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
voters shall seal a copy of the vote tally for same-day election
registration ballots in a depository envelope with the same-day election
registration ballots and store such same-day election registration
depository envelope with the other election results materials. The same-
day election registration depository envelope shall be preserved by the
registrars of voters for the period of time required to preserve counted
ballots for elections.
(h) Except as provided in section 9-163bb, as amended by this act, the
provisions of this title and any regulation adopted under this title
concerning procedures relating to the custody, control and counting of
absentee ballots shall apply, as nearly as possible, to the custody, control
and counting of same-day election registration ballots under this
section.
(i) After the acceptance of a same-day election registration, the
registrars of voters shall forthwith send a registration confirmation
notice to the residential address of each applicant who was admitted as
an elector on election day or during the period of early voting prior to
election day under this section. Such confirmation shall be sent by first
class mail with instructions on the envelope that it be returned if not
deliverable at the address shown on the envelope. If a confirmation
notice is returned undelivered, the registrars shall forthwith take the
necessary action in accordance with section 9-35 or 9-43, as applicable,
notwithstanding the May first deadline in section 9-35.
(j) (1) No person shall solicit on behalf of or in opposition to any
candidate or on behalf of or in opposition to any question being
submitted at the election, or loiter or peddle or offer any advertising
matter, ballot or circular to another person within a radius of seventy-
five feet of any outside entrance in use as an entry to any building that
contains any location designated by the registrars of voters for same-
day election registration balloting or in any corridor, passageway or
other approach leading from any such outside entrance to any such
Public Act No. 26-1 90 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
location or in any room opening upon any such corridor, passageway
or approach.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, no person
shall be allowed within any location designated by the registrars of
voters for same-day election registration balloting for any purpose other
than casting such person's vote, except (A) primary officials under
section 9-436, (B) election officials under section 9-258, including (i) a
municipal clerk or registrar of voters, who is a candidate for the same
office, and (ii) a deputy registrar of voters, who is a candidate for the
office of registrar of voters, performing such official's duties, and (C)
unofficial checkers under section 9-235.
(3) A person, including any candidate or any campaign or party
employee or volunteer, may be within the seventy-five-foot radius
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection (A) only for purposes
related to the performance of such person's official duties or to the
conduct of government business within such radius, (B) only for as long
as necessary to perform such duties or conduct such business, and (C)
provided such person is not engaged in any conduct described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(k) No election official shall perform services for any party or
candidate on any day on which such election official is appointed to
serve under this section, nor appear at any political party headquarters
prior to the hour prescribed under subsection (b) or subdivision (1) of
subsection (c) of section 9-174, as applicable, for the closing of the
location designated for same-day election registration on such day.
Sec. 72. Section 9-228a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) [The] Not later than the thirty-first day preceding the day of each
municipal, state or federal election or primary, the registrars of voters of
Public Act No. 26-1 91 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
each municipality shall [, not later than thirty-one days prior to each
municipal, state or federal election or primary,] certify to the Secretary
of the State, in writing, the location of each polling place that will be
used for such election or primary. Such certification shall detail the
name, address, relevant contact information and corresponding federal,
state and municipal districts associated with each polling place used for
such election or primary.
(b) [The] Not later than the fourteenth day preceding the
commencement of the period of early voting at each municipal, state or
federal election or primary, in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (a) of section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, the registrars
of voters of each municipality shall [, prior to each municipal, state or
federal election or primary,] provide a written report to the Secretary of
the State setting forth the names, [and] addresses and, if available,
cellular mobile telephone numbers of each moderator for each (1)
polling place location disclosed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, (2) location designated for the conduct of early voting pursuant
to subsection (b) of section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, and (3)
location designated for the completion and processing of same-day
election registrations pursuant to subsection (c) of section 9-19j, as
amended by this act.
(c) The Secretary of the State shall have the authority to disqualify
any moderator appointed by the registrars of voters if, after consultation
with both registrars of voters, the Secretary determines such moderator
has committed material misconduct, material neglect of duty or material
incompetence in the discharge of his or her duties as a moderator. If the
Secretary disqualifies a moderator, the Secretary shall share his or her
findings upon which the disqualification was based with the registrars
of voters.
Sec. 73. Section 9-247 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-1 92 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
The registrars of voters shall, before [the day of the] the
commencement of the period of early voting at each election, cause test
ballots to be inserted in each voting tabulator to ensure that each voting
tabulator is prepared and read and cause each other voting system
approved by the Secretary of the State for use in the election, including,
but not limited to, voting devices equipped for individuals with
disabilities that comply with the provisions of the Help America Vote
Act, P.L. 107-25, as amended from time to time, to be put in order in
every way and set and adjust the same so that it shall be ready for use
in voting when delivered at the polling place, location designated for
the conduct of early voting or location designated for the conduct of
same-day election registration, as applicable. Such registrars of voters
shall cause each voting system to be in order and set and adjusted, to be
delivered at the polling place, location designated for the conduct of
early voting or location designated for the conduct of same-day election
registration, as applicable, together with all necessary furniture and
appliances that go with the same, at the room where [the election is to
be held] voting at such election is to take place, and to be tested and
operable not later than one hour prior to the opening of the polling
place, location designated for the conduct of early voting or location
designated for the conduct of same-day election registration, as
applicable.
Sec. 74. Section 9-56 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Except as otherwise provided in the case of an elector whose name
has not been placed on or has been removed from the enrollment list
under section 9-59, 9-60, 9-61 or 9-62, any elector not enrolled on any
enrollment list may at any time make a written and signed application
for enrollment to the registrars of voters on an application form for
admission as an elector, in accordance with the requirements of this
section. The application shall be effective as of the date it is filed with
Public Act No. 26-1 93 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the registrars of voters of the town of residence of the applicant and any
person making application for enrollment in such manner shall
immediately be entitled to the privileges of party enrollment unless the
application for enrollment (1) is filed in person by the applicant with the
registrars of voters after twelve o'clock noon on the last business day
before a primary, in which case he shall be entitled to the privileges of
party enrollment immediately after the primary, (2) is otherwise filed
with the registrar after the [fifth] eighteenth day before the primary, in
which case he shall be entitled to the privileges of party enrollment
immediately after the primary, except as provided in section 9-23a, or
(3) is filed with the registrars of voters after 5:00 p.m. on the last business
day before a caucus or convention, in which case he shall be entitled to
the privileges of party enrollment immediately after the caucus or
convention. The application shall be signed or initialed by the registrar,
deputy, assistant or registrar's clerk receiving it, or by such other
personnel as such registrar or deputy may appoint for the purpose,
showing the date when such application is received and, in the case of
an applicant not immediately eligible under section 9-59, 9-60, 9-61 or 9-
62 to the privileges accompanying enrollment in the party named in his
application, the date upon which such applicant becomes so eligible. In
municipalities divided into voting districts in which an enrollment
session is held in each district thereof under section 9-51, application for
enrollment shall be made to the registrar or assistant registrar, as the
case may be, in the voting district in which such elector is entitled to
vote at the time of making such application. If any registrar or assistant
registrar fails to add any name to any such list on written application or
adds any name to any such list except as herein provided, he shall be
guilty of a class D misdemeanor.
Sec. 75. Subsection (d) of section 9-229 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
Public Act No. 26-1 94 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(d) If the person designated as moderator is unable to serve for any
reason, a certified alternate moderator shall serve as moderator. If such
certified alternate moderator is not called upon to serve as moderator,
he shall serve in another capacity as an election official on election or
primary day. If any town or voting district lacks a moderator due to the
death, disability or withdrawal of a certified moderator or alternate
moderator, or due to the disqualification of a moderator for any reason,
including failure to attend an instructional session as required by this
section, the registrars of voters shall appoint a new moderator for such
town or voting district in the manner provided in this section, except
that the registrars shall not appoint as moderator any person who has,
in a court of competent jurisdiction, been convicted of or pled guilty or
nolo contendere to any (1) felony involving fraud, forgery, larceny,
embezzlement or bribery, or (2) criminal offense under this title. Such
new moderator shall attend an instructional session and a certification
session conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section. If
all such sessions have been conducted at the time of appointment of the
new moderator, the new moderator shall receive instruction from the
registrars who appointed the new moderator.
Sec. 76. Section 9-169 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
The legislative body of any town, consolidated town and city or
consolidated town and borough may divide and, from time to time,
redivide such municipality into voting districts. The registrars of voters
of any municipality taking such action shall provide a suitable polling
place in each district but, if the registrars fail to agree as to the location
of any polling place or places, the legislative body shall determine the
location thereof. Polling places to be used in an election shall be
determined at least thirty-one days before such election, and such
polling places shall not be changed within said period of thirty-one days
except that, if the municipal clerk and registrars of voters of a
Public Act No. 26-1 95 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
municipality unanimously find that any such polling place within such
municipality has been rendered unusable within such period, they shall
forthwith designate another polling place to be used in place of the one
so rendered unusable and shall give adequate notice that such polling
place has been so changed. The registrars of voters shall keep separate
lists of the electors residing in each district and shall appoint for each
district a moderator in accordance with the provisions of section 9-229,
as amended by this act, and such other election officials as are required
by law, and shall designate one of the moderators so appointed or any
other elector of such town to be the head moderator for the purpose of
declaring the results of elections in the whole municipality, except that
the registrars shall not appoint as moderator any person who has, in a
court of competent jurisdiction, been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo
contendere to any (1) felony involving fraud, forgery, larceny,
embezzlement or bribery, or (2) criminal offense under this title. The
registrars may also designate a deputy head moderator to assist the
head moderator in the performance of his duties provided the deputy
head moderator and the head moderator shall not be enrolled in the
same major party, as defined in subdivision (5) of section 9-372. The
selectmen, town clerk, registrars of voters and all other officers of the
municipality shall perform the duties required of them by law with
respect to elections in each voting district established in accordance with
this section. Voting district lines shall not be drawn by a municipality so
as to conflict with the lines of congressional districts, senate districts or
assembly districts as established by law, except [(1)] (A) as provided in
section 9-169d, and [(2)] (B) that as to municipal elections, any part of a
split voting district containing less than two hundred electors may be
combined with another voting district adjacent thereto from which all
and the same officers are elected at such municipal election. Any change
in the boundaries of voting districts made within ninety days prior to
any election or primary shall not apply with respect to such election or
primary. The provisions of this section shall prevail over any contrary
provision of any charter or special act.
Public Act No. 26-1 96 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 77. Section 9-322a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Not later than forty-eight hours following each regular election,
the registrars of voters shall provide the results of the votes cast at such
election to the town clerk. Not later than nine o'clock a.m. on the third
day following each regular election, the head moderator, registrars of
voters and town clerk for each town [divided into voting districts] shall
meet to identify any error in the returns. Not later than one o'clock p.m.
on the third day following each regular election, the head moderator
shall correct any error identified and file an amended return with the
Secretary of the State, the town clerk and the registrars of voters.
(b) Not later than twenty-one days following each regular state
election, the town clerk of each town [divided into voting districts] shall
file with the Secretary of the State a consolidated listing, in tabular
format, as prescribed by the Secretary of the State, of the official returns
[of each such voting district] for all offices voted on at such election,
including the total number of votes cast for each candidate, the total
number of names on the registry list, and the total number of names
checked as having voted. [, in each such district.] The town clerk of such
town shall certify that he or she has examined the lists transmitted under
this section to determine whether there are any discrepancies between
the total number of votes cast for a candidate at such election in such
town, including for any recanvass conducted pursuant to section 9-311,
as amended by this act, or 9-311a, as amended by this act, and the sum
of the votes cast for the same candidate in all voting districts in such
town if such town has been divided into voting districts. In the case of
any such discrepancy, the town clerk shall notify the head moderator
and certify that such discrepancy has been rectified. Each listing filed
under this section shall be retained by the Secretary of the State not less
than ten years after the date of the election for which it was filed.
Sec. 78. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section,
Public Act No. 26-1 97 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
"municipality", "government enforcement action", "federal Voting
Rights Act" and "protected class" have the same meanings as provided
in section 9-368i of the general statutes.
(b) The corporation counsel of any municipality that has been subject
to any court order or government enforcement action described in
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-368m
of the general statutes shall provide to the office of the Secretary of the
State all details pertaining to such matter not later than one month after
the effective date of this section, the issuance of such court order or the
commencement of such government enforcement action, whichever is
latest.
(c) If an action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction alleges a
violation of the provisions of sections 9-368j to 9-368q, inclusive, of the
general statutes, the federal Voting Rights Act, any state or federal civil
rights law, the fifteenth amendment to the United States Constitution or
the fourteenth amendment to the United States Constitution, which
violation concerns the right to vote or a pattern, practice or policy of
discrimination against any protected class, the party that filed such
action shall cause notice of the hearing on such action to be given to the
Secretary of the State.
Sec. 79. Section 9-388 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Whenever a convention of a political party is held for the
endorsement of candidates for nomination to state or district office, each
candidate endorsed at such convention shall file with the Secretary of
the State a certificate, signed by him, stating that he was endorsed by
such convention, his name as he authorizes it to appear on the ballot, his
full residence address and the title and district, if applicable, of the office
for which he was endorsed. Such certificate shall be attested by either
(1) the chairman or presiding officer, or (2) the secretary of such
Public Act No. 26-1 98 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
convention and shall be received by the Secretary of the State not later
than four o'clock p.m. on the fourteenth day after the close of such
convention. Such certificate shall either be mailed to the Secretary of the
State by certified mail, return receipt requested, or delivered in person,
in which case a receipt indicating the date and time of delivery shall be
provided by the Secretary of the State to the person making delivery. If
a certificate of a party's endorsement for a particular state or district
office is not received by the Secretary of the State by such time, such
certificate shall be invalid and such party, for the purposes of [section 9-
416 and section 9-416a] sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be deemed to
have made no endorsement of any candidate for such office. If
applicable, the chairman of a party's state convention shall, forthwith
upon the close of such convention, file with the Secretary of the State the
names and full residence addresses of persons selected by such
convention as the nominees of such party for electors of President and
Vice-President of the United States in accordance with the provisions of
section 9-175.
(b) (1) In the case of a timely filed certificate of a party's endorsement
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, which contains an error or
omission that would operate to invalidate such endorsement, the
candidate so certified or an individual authorized to act on behalf of
such candidate may correct such error or omission by appearing in
person at the office of the Secretary of the State, on a day other than a
Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, not later than four o'clock p.m. on
the nineteenth day after the close of the state or district convention, as
applicable, and amending such certificate to make such correction. If
such candidate or individual does not appear to so amend such
certificate by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and such party,
for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be deemed to have
made no such endorsement.
(2) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
Public Act No. 26-1 99 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
subdivision (1) of this subsection, amend a timely filed certificate of a
party's endorsement to correct any such error or omission, and shall
keep a record of any such amendment made pursuant to this
subdivision. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require
the Secretary to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or omission
in any such certificate.
Sec. 80. Subsection (c) of section 9-391 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(c) (1) Each endorsement of a candidate to run in a primary for the
nomination of candidates for a municipal office to be voted upon at a
state election shall be made under the provisions of section 9-390 not
earlier than the eighty-fourth day or later than the seventy-seventh day
preceding the day of such primary. Each certification to be filed under
this subsection shall be received by the Secretary of the State not later
than four o'clock p.m. on the fourteenth day after the close of the town
committee meeting, caucus or convention, as the case may be. If such a
certificate of a party's endorsement is not received by the Secretary of
the State by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and such party,
for the purposes of sections 9-417 and 9-418, shall be deemed to have
neither made nor certified any endorsement of any candidate for such
office. The candidate so endorsed for a municipal office to be voted upon
at a state election, other than the office of justice of the peace, shall file
with the Secretary of the State a certificate, signed by that candidate,
stating that such candidate was so endorsed, the candidate's name as
the candidate authorizes it to appear on the ballot, the candidate's full
street address and the title and district of the office for which the
candidate was endorsed. Such certificate may be filed by a candidate
whose name appears upon the last-completed enrollment list of such
party within the senatorial district within which the candidate is
endorsed to run for nomination in the case of the municipal office of
Public Act No. 26-1 100 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
state senator, or the assembly district within which the candidate is
endorsed to run for nomination in the case of the municipal office of
state representative, or the municipality or political subdivision within
which the candidate is to run for nomination for other municipal offices
to be voted on at a state election. Such certificate shall be attested by
either the chairperson or presiding officer or the secretary of the town
committee, caucus or convention which made such endorsement. The
endorsement of any candidate for the office of justice of the peace shall
be certified to the clerk of the municipality by either the chairperson or
presiding officer or the secretary of the town committee, caucus or
convention, and shall contain the name and street address of each
candidate so endorsed and the title of the office for which each such
candidate is endorsed. Such certification shall be made on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of the State or on such other form as may
comply with the provisions of this subsection.
(2) (A) In the case of a timely filed certificate of a party's endorsement
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, which contains an error
or omission that would operate to invalidate such endorsement, the
candidate so certified or an individual authorized to act on behalf of
such candidate may correct such error or omission by appearing in
person at the office of the Secretary of the State, on a day other than a
Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, not later than four o'clock p.m. on
the nineteenth day after the close of the town committee meeting,
caucus or convention, as applicable, and amending such certificate to
make such correction. If such candidate or individual does not appear
to so amend such certificate by such time, such certificate shall be
invalid and such party, for the purposes of sections 9-417 and 9-418,
shall be deemed to have neither made nor certified such endorsement.
(B) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, amend a timely filed certificate of
a party's endorsement to correct any such error or omission, and shall
Public Act No. 26-1 101 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
keep a record of any such amendment made pursuant to this
subparagraph. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to
require the Secretary to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or
omission in any such certificate.
Sec. 81. Section 9-400 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) A candidacy for nomination by a political party to a state office
may be filed by or on behalf of any person whose name appears upon
the last-completed enrollment list of such party in any municipality
within the state and who has either (1) received at least fifteen per cent
of the votes of the convention delegates present and voting on any roll-
call vote taken on the endorsement or proposed endorsement of a
candidate for such state office, whether or not the party-endorsed
candidate for such office received a unanimous vote on the last ballot,
or (2) circulated a petition and obtained the signatures of at least two
per cent of the enrolled members of such party in the state, in accordance
with the provisions of sections 9-404a to 9-404c, inclusive. Candidacies
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be filed by
submitting to the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock p.m.
on the fourteenth day following the close of the state convention, a
certificate, signed by such candidate and attested by either (A) the
chairman or presiding officer, or (B) the secretary of the convention, that
such candidate received at least fifteen per cent of such votes, and that
such candidate consents to be a candidate in a primary of such party for
such state office. Such certificate shall specify the candidate's name as
the candidate authorizes it to appear on the ballot, the candidate's full
residence address and the title of the office for which the candidacy is
being filed. If such certificate for a state office is not received by the
Secretary of the State by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and
such person, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be
deemed to have made no valid certification of candidacy for nomination
Public Act No. 26-1 102 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
by a political party [for] to such state office. A single such certificate or
petition for state office may be filed on behalf of two or more candidates
for different state offices who consent to have their names appear on a
single row of the primary ballot under subsection (b) of section 9-437.
Candidacies described in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be filed
by submitting said petition not later than four o'clock p.m. on the sixty-
third day preceding the day of the primary for such office to the registrar
of voters of the towns in which the respective petition pages were
circulated. Each registrar shall file each page of such petition with the
Secretary of the State in accordance with the provisions of section 9-404c.
A petition filed by or on behalf of a candidate for state office shall be
invalid for such candidate if such candidate is certified as the party-
endorsed candidate pursuant to section 9-388, as amended by this act,
or as receiving at least fifteen per cent of the convention vote for such
office pursuant to this subsection. Except as provided in section 9-416a,
upon the expiration of the time period for party endorsement and
circulation and tabulation of petitions and signatures, if any, if one or
more candidacies for such state office have been filed pursuant to the
provisions of this section, the Secretary of the State shall notify all town
clerks and registrars of voters in accordance with the provisions of
section 9-433, that a primary for such state office shall be held in each
municipality in accordance with the provisions of section 9-415.
(b) A candidacy for nomination by a political party to a district office
may be filed by or on behalf of any person whose name appears upon
the last-completed enrollment list of such party within the district the
person seeks to represent that is in the office of the Secretary of the State
at the end of the last day prior to the convention for the party from
which the person seeks nomination and who has either (1) received at
least fifteen per cent of the votes of the convention delegates present and
voting on any roll-call vote taken on the endorsement or proposed
endorsement of a candidate for such district office, whether or not the
party-endorsed candidate for such office received a unanimous vote on
Public Act No. 26-1 103 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the last ballot, or (2) circulated a petition and obtained the signatures of
at least two per cent of the enrolled members of such party in the district
for the district office of representative in Congress, and at least five per
cent of the enrolled members of such party in the district for the district
offices of state senator, state representative and judge of probate, in
accordance with the provisions of sections 9-404a to 9-404c, inclusive.
Candidacies described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be filed
by submitting to the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock
p.m. on the fourteenth day following the close of the district convention,
a certificate, signed by such candidate and attested by either (A) the
chairman or presiding officer, or (B) the secretary of the convention, that
such candidate received at least fifteen per cent of such votes, and that
the candidate consents to be a candidate in a primary of such party for
such district office. Such certificate shall specify the candidate's name as
the candidate authorizes it to appear on the ballot, the candidate's full
residence address and the title and district of the office for which the
candidacy is being filed. If such certificate for a district office is not
received by the Secretary of the State by such time, such certificate shall
be invalid and such person, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-
416a, shall be deemed to have made no valid certification of candidacy
for nomination by a political party [for] to such district office.
Candidacies described in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be filed
by submitting said petition not later than four o'clock p.m. on the sixty-
third day preceding the day of the primary for such office to the registrar
of voters of the towns in which the respective petition pages were
circulated. Each registrar shall file each page of such petition with the
Secretary in accordance with the provisions of section 9-404c. A petition
may only be filed by or on behalf of a candidate for the district office of
state senator, state representative or judge of probate who is not certified
as the party-endorsed candidate pursuant to section 9-388, as amended
by this act, or as receiving at least fifteen per cent of the convention vote
for such office pursuant to this subsection. A petition filed by or on
behalf of a candidate for the district office of representative in Congress
Public Act No. 26-1 104 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
shall be invalid if said candidate is certified as the party-endorsed
candidate pursuant to section 9-388, as amended by this act, or as
receiving at least fifteen per cent of the convention vote for such office
pursuant to this subsection. Except as provided in section 9-416a, upon
the expiration of the time period for party endorsement and circulation
and tabulation of petitions and signatures, if any, if one or more
candidacies for such district office have been filed pursuant to the
provisions of this section, the Secretary of the State shall notify all town
clerks within the district, in accordance with the provisions of section 9-
433, that a primary for such district office shall be held in each
municipality and each part of a municipality within the district in
accordance with the provisions of section 9-415.
(c) (1) In the case of a timely filed certificate of candidacy for
nomination by a political party pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this
section, which contains an error or omission that would operate to
invalidate such candidacy for nomination, the person so certified or an
agent of such person may correct such error or omission by appearing
in person at the office of the Secretary of the State, on a day other than a
Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, not later than four o'clock p.m. on
the nineteenth day after the close of the state or district convention, as
applicable, and amending such certificate to make such correction,
provided neither failure of such person to timely file such certificate
pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section nor failure of the
chairperson, presiding officer or secretary of the convention to attest
such certificate shall be an error or omission that may be corrected
pursuant to this subsection. If such person or agent does not appear to
so amend such certificate by such time, such certificate shall be invalid
and such person, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be
deemed to have made no valid certification of candidacy for nomination
by a political party. As used in this subsection, "agent" means an
individual authorized to act on behalf of a person.
Public Act No. 26-1 105 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
(2) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, amend a timely filed certificate of
candidacy for nomination to correct any such error or omission, and
shall keep a record of any such amendment made pursuant to this
subdivision. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require
the Secretary to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or omission
in any such certificate.
[(c)] (d) For the purposes of this section, the number of enrolled
members of a party shall be determined by the latest enrollment records
in the office of the Secretary of the State prior to the earliest date that
primary petitions were available. The names of electors on the inactive
registry list compiled under section 9-35 shall not be counted for
purposes of computing the number of petition signatures required
under this section, as provided in section 9-35c.
[(d)] (e) On the last day for filing primary petition candidacies in
accordance with the provisions of this section, the office or office
facilities of the registrars of voters shall open not later than one o'clock
p.m., and remain open until at least four o'clock p.m., and such
registrars or the deputy or assistant registrars shall be present.
Sec. 82. Section 9-452 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) All minor parties nominating candidates for any elective office
shall make such nominations and certify and file a list of such
nominations, as required by this section, not later than the sixty-second
day prior to the day of the election at which such candidates are to be
voted for. A list of nominees in printed or typewritten form that includes
each candidate's name as authorized by each candidate to appear on the
ballot, the signature of each candidate, the full street address of each
candidate and the title and district of the office for which each candidate
is nominated shall be certified by the presiding officer of the committee,
Public Act No. 26-1 106 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
meeting or other authority making such nomination and shall be filed
by such presiding officer with the Secretary of the State, in the case of
any state, district or municipal office to be voted upon at a state election,
or with the clerk of the municipality, in the case of any municipal office
to be voted upon at a municipal election, not later than the sixty-second
day prior to the day of the election. The registrars of voters of such
municipality shall promptly verify and correct the names on any such
list filed with him, or the names of nominees forwarded to the clerk of
the municipality by the Secretary of the State, in accordance with the
registry list of such municipality and endorse the same as having been
so verified and corrected. For the purposes of this section, a list of
nominations shall be deemed to be filed when it is received by the
Secretary of the State or clerk of the municipality, as appropriate. If such
certificate of a party's nomination is not received by the Secretary of the
State or clerk of the municipality, as appropriate, by such time, such
certificate shall be invalid and such party, for purposes of sections 9-460,
9-461 and 9-462, shall be deemed to have neither made nor certified any
nomination of any candidate for such office. A candidacy for
nomination by a minor party to a district or municipal office may be
filed on behalf of any person whose name appears on the last-completed
registry list of the district or municipality represented by such office, as
the case may be. A candidacy for nomination by a minor party to a state
office may be filed on behalf of any person whose name appears on the
last-completed registry list of the state.
(b) (1) In the case of a timely filed certificate of nomination for any
state, district or municipal office to be voted upon at a state election
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, which contains an error or
omission that would operate to invalidate such nomination, the
candidate so certified or an individual authorized to act on behalf of
such candidate may correct such error or omission by appearing in
person at the office of the Secretary of the State, on a day other than a
Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, not later than four o'clock p.m. on
Public Act No. 26-1 107 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
the fifty-seventh day prior to the day of the election and amending such
certificate to make such correction, provided neither failure of the
presiding officer of the committee, meeting or other authority to timely
file such certificate pursuant to subsection (a) of this section nor failure
of the candidate to sign such certificate shall be an error or omission that
may be corrected pursuant to this subsection. If such candidate or
individual does not appear to so amend such certificate by such time,
such certificate shall be invalid and such party, for the purposes of
sections 9-460, 9-461 and 9-462, shall be deemed to have neither made
nor certified any such nomination.
(2) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, amend a timely filed certificate of
nomination to correct any such error or omission, and shall keep a
record of any such amendment made pursuant to this subdivision.
Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the Secretary
to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or omission in any such
certificate.
Sec. 83. Section 9-250 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Ballots shall be printed in plain clear type and on material of such
size as will fit the tabulator, and shall be furnished by the registrar of
voters. The size and style of the type used to print the name of a political
party on a ballot shall be identical with the size and style of the type
used to print the names of all other political parties appearing on such
ballot. The name of each major party candidate for a municipal office, as
defined in section 9-372, except for the municipal offices of state senator
and state representative, shall appear on the ballot as authorized by each
candidate. The name of each major party candidate for a state or district
office, as defined in section 9-372, or for the municipal office of state
senator or state representative shall appear on the ballot as it appears on
the certificate or statement of consent filed under section 9-388, as
Public Act No. 26-1 108 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
amended by this act, subsection (b) of section 9-391, or section 9-400, as
amended by this act, or 9-409. The name of each minor party candidate
shall appear on the ballot as authorized by each candidate. The name of
each nominating petition candidate shall appear on the ballot as it is
verified by the town clerk on the application filed under section 9-453b.
The size and style of the type used to print the name of a candidate on a
ballot shall be identical with the size and style of the type used to print
the names of all other candidates appearing on such ballot. Such ballot
shall contain the names of the offices and the names of the candidates
arranged thereon. The names of the political parties and party
designations shall be arranged on the ballots and followed by the word
"party", either in columns or horizontal rows as set forth in section 9-
249a, immediately adjacent to the column or row occupied by the
candidate or candidates of such political party or organization. The
ballot shall be printed in such manner as to indicate how many
candidates the elector may vote for each office, provided in the case of a
town adopting the provisions of section 9-204a, such ballot shall indicate
the maximum number of candidates who may be elected to such office
from any party. If two or more candidates are to be elected to the same
office for different terms, the term for which each is nominated shall be
printed on the official ballot as a part of the title of the office. If, at any
election, one candidate is to be elected for a full term and another to fill
a vacancy, the official ballot containing the names of the candidates in
the foregoing order shall, as a part of the title of the office, designate the
term which such candidates are severally nominated to fill. No column,
under the name of any political party or independent organization, shall
be printed on any official ballot, which contains more candidates for any
office than the number for which an elector may vote for that office.
(b) Not later than ten days prior to the commencement of the period
of early voting at an election, the town clerk of each municipality shall
file with the Secretary of the State, for each voting district in such
municipality, the official ballot to be used for such voting district. No
Public Act No. 26-1 109 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
such official ballot shall be used at any election unless it has been
approved by the Secretary of the State.
Sec. 84. Subsection (j) of section 9-437 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(j) (1) All ballots used at a primary shall be prepared by the clerk of
the municipality in which such primary is held and shall be printed at
the expense of the municipality. Not later than ten days prior to the
commencement of the period of early voting at a primary, such clerk
shall file with the Secretary of the State, for each voting district in such
municipality at which such primary is held, the ballot to be used for
such voting district. No such ballot shall be used at any primary unless
it has been approved by the Secretary of the State.
(2) Each municipality shall provide for all polling places:
[(1)] (A) At least forty-eight hours before the primary, [such clerk
shall have] sample ballots for general distribution by such clerk, which
shall contain the offices or positions and names of candidates to be voted
upon. Each such sample ballot shall also include printed instructions
approved by the Secretary of the State concerning the use of the voting
tabulator and information concerning the date of the primary and the
hours during which polling places will be open. Such clerk shall have
available for distribution such number of sample ballots as such clerk
deems advisable, but in no event less than three which shall be posted
inside the polling place so as to be visible to those within the polling
place during the whole day of the primary. At least one of such sample
ballots shall be posted so as to be visible to an elector being instructed
on the demonstrator device, pursuant to section 9-260. If paper ballots
are used in any primary, such sample paper ballots shall be overprinted
with the word "Sample";
Public Act No. 26-1 110 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
[(2)] (B) Instructions on how to cast a provisional ballot, as prescribed
by the Secretary of the State;
[(3)] (C) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters who
register to vote by mail on or after January 1, 2003, as prescribed by the
Secretary of the State;
[(4)] (D) General information concerning voting rights under federal
and Connecticut laws, including information on the right of an
individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact
the appropriate officials if such rights are alleged to have been violated,
as prescribed by the Secretary of the State; and
[(5)] (E) General information on federal and state laws concerning
prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation, as prescribed by
the Secretary of the State.
Sec. 85. Subsection (a) of section 9-135a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) Each absentee ballot shall be arranged to resemble the appropriate
ballot and sample ballot as prescribed by law, and shall include, as
applicable, the offices, party designations, names of candidates and
questions to be voted upon and spaces for write-in votes. A replica of
the state seal shall be printed on the ballot. The size, type, form,
instructions, specifications for paper and printing and other
specifications shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the State. Prior to
printing such absentee ballots pursuant to this section, the clerk of the
municipality shall file with the Secretary of the State, for each voting
district in such municipality, the absentee ballot to be used for such
voting district. No such absentee ballot shall be used at any election or
primary unless it has been approved by the Secretary of the State.
Sec. 86. Section 9-135b of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-1 111 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Immediately after the deadline for certification of all candidates
whose names are to appear on the ballot, and in sufficient time to begin
issuing absentee ballots on the day prescribed by law, the municipal
clerk shall prepare the absentee ballots and have them printed. Prior to
printing such ballots, the registrars of voters of the municipality may
provide comments concerning the content and form of such ballots to
the clerk, provided no such ballot shall be printed unless the Secretary
of the State has approved of such ballot in accordance with section 9-
135a, as amended by this act.
(b) A layout model of each different absentee ballot shall be available
for public inspection at the clerk's office prior to printing. The model
shall indicate the type face to be used, the spelling and placement of
names and other information to be printed on the ballots.
(c) Immediately upon receiving the printed absentee ballots, the
municipal clerk shall file one with the Secretary of the State or, if there
are different ballots for different political subdivisions, one ballot for
each subdivision. The clerk shall also file his affidavit with the Secretary,
stating the number of ballots printed. The form of affidavit shall be
prescribed by the Secretary. If any correction or alteration is
subsequently made on any absentee ballot the clerk shall immediately
file a corrected or altered ballot and, using the prescribed form, his
affidavit stating the number of such ballots printed, with the Secretary.
(d) If a vacancy in candidacy occurs after the ballots have been
printed, the clerk may either reprint the ballots or cause printed stickers
to be affixed to them so that the name of any candidate who has vacated
his candidacy is deleted and the name of any candidate chosen to fill the
vacancy as provided in section 9-428 or section 9-460 appears in the
same position as that in which the vacated candidacy appeared except
as provided in section 9-426 or 9-453s. If no candidate is chosen to fill
Public Act No. 26-1 112 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
such vacancy as so provided, the clerk shall cause the name of the
candidate whose candidacy has been vacated to be obscured in such
manner that such name is no longer visible.
(e) [The] Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
Secretary of the State [shall examine each absentee ballot required to be
filed pursuant to this section and if a ballot contains an omission or
error, the Secretary shall order] from ordering the municipal clerk to
reprint a corrected absentee ballot or to take such other action as the
Secretary may deem appropriate in the case of an absentee ballot that
contains an omission or error.
Sec. 87. Section 9-256 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
[The registrars of voters of each municipality shall, not less than ten
days prior to the commencement of the period of early voting at an
election, file with the Secretary of the State a sample ballot identical with
those to be provided for each polling place under section 9-255. The
Secretary of the State shall examine the sample ballot required to be filed
under this section, and if such sample ballot contains an error, the
Secretary of the State shall order] Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (b) of section 9-250, as amended by this act, the Secretary of
the State may order the registrars of voters to reprint a corrected
[sample] ballot or to take other such action as the Secretary may deem
appropriate in the case of any ballot that contains an omission or error.
Sec. 88. Subsection (a) of section 9-140b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) An absentee ballot shall be cast at a primary, election or
referendum only if: (1) It is mailed by (A) the ballot applicant, (B) a
designee of a person who applies for an absentee ballot because of
Public Act No. 26-1 113 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
illness or physical disability, or (C) a member of the immediate family
of an applicant who is a student, so that it is received by the clerk of the
municipality in which the applicant is qualified to vote not later than the
close of the polls; (2) it is returned by the applicant in person to the clerk
by the day before [a regular election, special] the election or primary or
prior to the opening of the polls on the day of [a] the referendum; (3) it
is returned by a designee of an ill or physically disabled ballot applicant,
in person, to said clerk not later than the close of the polls on the day of
the election, primary or referendum; (4) it is returned by a member of
the immediate family of the absentee voter, in person, to said clerk not
later than the close of the polls on the day of the election, primary or
referendum; (5) in the case of a presidential or overseas ballot, it is
mailed or otherwise returned pursuant to the provisions of section 9-
158g; or (6) it is returned with the proper identification as required by
the Help America Vote Act, P.L. 107-252, as amended from time to time,
if applicable, inserted in the outer envelope so such identification can be
viewed without opening the inner envelope. A person returning an
absentee ballot to the municipal clerk pursuant to subdivision (3) or (4)
of this subsection shall present identification and, on the outer envelope
of the absentee ballot, sign his name in the presence of the municipal
clerk, and indicate his address, his relationship to the voter or his
position, and the date and time of such return. As used in this section,
"immediate family" means a dependent relative who resides in the
individual's household or any spouse, child, parent or sibling of the
individual.
Sec. 89. Section 9-3 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The Secretary of the State, by virtue of the office, shall be the
Commissioner of Elections of the state, with such powers and duties
relating to the conduct of elections as are prescribed by law and, unless
otherwise provided by state statute, the Secretary's regulations,
Public Act No. 26-1 114 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
declaratory rulings, instructions and opinions, if in written form, and
any order issued under subsection (b) of this section, shall be presumed
as correctly interpreting and effectuating the administration of elections
and primaries under this title, except for chapters 155 to 158, inclusive,
and shall be executed, carried out or implemented, as the case may be,
provided nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the right of
appeal provided under the provisions of chapter 54. Any such written
instruction or opinion shall be labeled as an instruction or opinion
issued pursuant to this section, as applicable, and any such instruction
or opinion shall cite any authority that is discussed in such instruction
or opinion.
(b) During any municipal, state or federal election, primary or
recanvass, or any audit conducted pursuant to section 9-320f, the
Secretary of the State may issue an order, whether orally or in writing,
to any registrar of voters or moderator to correct any irregularity or
impropriety in the conduct of such election, primary or recanvass or
audit. Any such order shall be effective upon issuance. As soon as
practicable after issuance of an oral order pursuant to this subsection,
the Secretary shall reduce such order to writing, cite within such order
any applicable provision of law authorizing such order and cause a copy
of such written order to be delivered to the individual who is the subject
of such order or, in the case that such order was originally issued in
writing, issue a subsequent written order that conforms to such
requirements. The Superior Court, on application of the Secretary or the
Attorney General, may enforce by appropriate decree or process any
such order issued pursuant to this subsection.
(c) Whenever, during the ninety days preceding the day of an election
or primary, one or more electors have alleged aggrievement under this
title, the Secretary of the State may commence a declaratory judgment
action under section 52-29 for a determination as to whether such elector
or electors have been so aggrieved and for an order to ensure election
Public Act No. 26-1 115 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
administration procedures are properly executed and electors' rights are
adequately protected under this title.
Sec. 90. Subsection (d) of section 9-150a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) (1) If the statement on the inner envelope has not been signed as
required by section 9-140a, such inner envelope shall not be opened or
the ballot removed therefrom, and such inner envelope shall be replaced
in the opened outer envelope which shall be marked "Rejected" and the
reason therefor endorsed thereon by the counters. The moderator shall
maintain a log of each absentee ballot applicant whose ballot was
marked "Rejected" under this subdivision and include thereon for each
such applicant the reason for the rejection. The moderator shall transmit
such log to the Secretary of the State at the same time and in the same
manner as the duplicate list to be transmitted to the Secretary by
electronic means in accordance with section 9-314.
(2) If such statement is signed but the individual completing the
ballot is an individual described in subsection (a) of section 9-23r and
has not met the requirements of subsection (e) of section 9-23r, the
counters shall replace the ballot in the opened inner envelope, replace
the inner envelope in the opened outer envelope and mark "Rejected as
an Absentee Ballot" and endorse the reason for such rejection on the
outer envelope, and the ballot shall be treated as a provisional ballot for
federal offices only, pursuant to sections 9-232i to 9-232o, inclusive. The
moderator shall maintain a log of each absentee ballot applicant whose
ballot was marked "Rejected as an Absentee Ballot" under this
subdivision and include thereon for each such applicant the reason for
the rejection. The moderator shall transmit such log to the Secretary of
the State at the same time and in the same manner as the duplicate list
to be transmitted to the Secretary by electronic means in accordance
with section 9-314.
Public Act No. 26-1 116 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
Sec. 91. Subsection (a) of section 9-311 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) If, within three days after an election, it appears to the moderator
that there is a discrepancy in the returns of any voting district, such
moderator shall forthwith within said period summon, by written
notice delivered personally, the recanvass officials, consisting of at least
two checkers of different political parties and at least two absentee ballot
counters of different political parties who served at such election, and
the registrars of voters of the municipality in which the election was
held and such other officials as may be required to conduct such
recanvass. Such written notice shall require the clerk or registrars of
voters, as the case may be, to bring with them the depository envelopes
required by section 9-150a, as amended by this act, the package of write-
in ballots provided for in section 9-310, the absentee ballot applications,
the list of absentee ballot applications, the registry list and the
moderators' returns and shall require such recanvass officials to meet at
a specified time not later than the fifth business day after such election
to recanvass the returns of [a] each voting tabulator [or voting tabulators
or] and all absentee ballots [or] and write-in ballots used in [such
district] the municipality in such election. If any of such recanvass
officials are unavailable at the time of the recanvass, the registrar of
voters of the same political party as that of the recanvass official unable
to attend shall designate another elector having previous training and
experience in the conduct of elections to take such recanvass official's
place. Before such recanvass is made, such moderator shall give notice,
in writing, to the chairperson of the town committee of each political
party which nominated candidates for the election, and, in the case of a
state election, not later than twenty-four hours after a determination is
made regarding the need for a recanvass to the Secretary of the State, of
the time and place where such recanvass is to be made; and each such
chairperson may send party representatives to be present at such
Public Act No. 26-1 117 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
recanvass. Such party representatives may observe, but no one other
than a recanvass official may take part in the recanvass. If a party
representative notes any irregularity in the recanvass procedure, such
party representative shall be permitted to present evidence of such
irregularity in any contest relating to the election.
Sec. 92. Subsection (d) of section 9-311 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(d) (1) The moderator may, when any disorder arises that interferes
with the conduct of a recanvass, including any attempt by a person other
than a recanvass official to take part in such recanvass or by such a
person to communicate with a recanvass official, [other than the
moderator,] and the offender refuses to submit to the moderator's lawful
authority, order that the offender be removed by the recanvass officials
from such recanvass until the offender conforms to order or, if need be,
until such recanvass is completed.
(2) Each political party or, in the case of an office subject to recanvass
for which there is more than one candidate from a political party, each
candidate may appoint one representative to communicate directly with
the moderator during a recanvass.
Sec. 93. Section 9-311a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
For purposes of this section, state, district and municipal offices shall
be as defined in section 9-372 except that the office of presidential elector
shall be deemed a state office. Forthwith after a regular or special
election for municipal office, or forthwith upon tabulation of the vote
for state and district offices by the Secretary of the State, when at any
such election the plurality of an elected candidate for an office over the
Public Act No. 26-1 118 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
vote for a defeated candidate receiving the next highest number of votes
was either (1) less than a vote equivalent to one-half of one per cent of
the total number of votes cast for the office but not more than two
thousand votes, or (2) less than twenty votes, there shall be a recanvass
of the returns of the voting tabulator or voting tabulators and absentee
ballots used in such election for such office unless such defeated
candidate or defeated candidates, as the case may be, for such office file
a written statement waiving this right to such canvass with the
municipal clerk in the case of a municipal office, or with the Secretary of
the State in the case of a state or district office. In the case of state and
district offices, the Secretary of the State upon tabulation of the votes for
such offices shall notify the town clerks in the state or district, as the case
may be, of the state and district offices which qualify for an automatic
recanvass and shall also notify each candidate for any such office. When
a recanvass is to be held, the municipal clerk shall promptly notify the
moderator, as defined in section 9-311, as amended by this act, who shall
proceed forthwith to cause a recanvass of such returns of the office in
question in the same manner as is provided in section 9-311, as amended
by this act. In addition to the notice required under section 9-311, as
amended by this act, the moderator shall before such recanvass is made
give notice in writing of the time when, and place where, such recanvass
is to be made to each candidate for a municipal office which qualifies for
an automatic recanvass under this section. Nothing in this section shall
preclude the right to judicial proceedings on behalf of a candidate under
any provision of chapter 149. For the purposes of this section, "the total
number of votes cast for the office" means, in the case of multiple
openings for the same office, the total number of electors checked as
having voted in the state, district, municipality or political subdivision,
as the case may be. When a recanvass of the returns for an office for
which there are multiple openings is required by the provisions of this
section, the returns for all candidates for all openings for the office shall
be recanvassed. [No one other than a recanvass official shall take part in
the recanvass.] If a candidate notes any irregularity in the recanvass
Public Act No. 26-1 119 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
procedure, such candidate shall be permitted to present evidence of
such irregularity in any contest relating to the election.
Sec. 94. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Each ballot that has been cast at
an election, primary or referendum, including any write-in ballot, shall
be exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair the ability to
conduct any recanvass or audit under chapter 147, 148, 152 or 153 of the
general statutes. As used in this section, "ballot", "election",
"referendum" and "write-in ballot" have the same meanings as provided
in section 9-1 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, "primary"
has the same meaning as provided in section 9-372 of the general
statutes and "Freedom of Information Act" has the same meaning as
provided in section 1-200 of the general statutes.
Sec. 95. Subsection (n) of section 9-1 of the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(n) "Referendum" means (1) a question or proposal which is
submitted to a vote of the electors or voters of a municipality at any
regular or special state or municipal election, as defined in this section,
(2) a question or proposal which is submitted to a vote of the electors or
voters, as the case may be, of a municipality at a meeting of such electors
or voters, which meeting is not an election, as defined in subsection (d)
of this section, and is not a town meeting, or (3) a question or proposal
which is submitted to a vote of the electors or voters, as the case may be,
of a municipality at a meeting of such electors or voters pursuant to
section 7-7 or pursuant to charter, home rule ordinance or special act;
Sec. 96. Section 9-50d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) Whenever voter registration information maintained under
this title by the Secretary of the State or any registrar of voters is
Public Act No. 26-1 120 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
provided pursuant to any provision of the general statutes, disclosure
of a voter's date of birth shall be limited to only the [month and] year of
birth, unless such voter registration information is requested and used
for a state governmental purpose, as determined by the Secretary, in
which case the voter's complete date of birth shall be provided. As used
in this [section, a] subdivision, a state governmental purpose shall
include, but not be limited to, jury administration.
(2) (A) Voter registration information described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection (i) may only be used for election-related, scholarly,
journalistic, political or governmental purposes, and (ii) shall not be
used for any personal, private or commercial purpose, including, but
not limited to, (I) harassment, as described in section 53a-183, of any
voter or voter's household, (II) advertising, solicitation, sale or
marketing of products or services to any voter or voter's household, and
(III) reproduction in print, digital or broadcast visual or audio, or
display in any other format, of such information.
(B) Any person who violates the provisions of subparagraph (A) of
this subdivision shall be subject only to a civil penalty imposed by the
State Elections Enforcement Commission pursuant to subsection (a) of
section 9-7b, as amended by this act.
(3) The Secretary of the State may adopt regulations, in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54, concerning the use of voter
registration information.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, any motor
vehicle operator's license number, identity card number or Social
Security number on a voter registration record shall be confidential and
shall not be disclosed to any person.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, if a voter
submits to [the Secretary of the State] a registrar of voters of the town of
Public Act No. 26-1 121 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
such voter's voting residence a signed statement that nondisclosure of
such voter's name from the official registry list is necessary for the safety
of such voter or the voter's family, the name and address of such voter
on his or her voter registration record shall be confidential and shall not
be disclosed, except that an election, primary or referendum official may
view such information on the official registry list when such list is used
by any such official at a polling place on the day of an election, primary
or referendum. Such signed statement shall be sworn under penalty of
false statement, as provided in section 53a-157b.
Sec. 97. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 9-7b of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(2) To levy a civil penalty not to exceed (A) two thousand dollars per
offense against any person the commission finds to be in violation of
any provision of chapter 145, part V of chapter 146, part I of chapter 147,
chapter 148, section 7-9, section 9-12, subsection (a) of section 9-17,
section 9-19b, 9-19e, 9-19g to 9-19k, inclusive, 9-20, 9-21, 9-23a, 9-23g, 9-
23h, 9-23j to 9-23o, inclusive, 9-23r, 9-26, 9-31a, 9-32, 9-35, 9-35b, 9-35c,
9-40a, 9-42, 9-43, 9-50a, 9-50d, as amended by this act, 9-56, 9-59, 9-163aa,
as amended by this act, 9-168d, 9-170, 9-171, 9-172, 9-232i to 9-232o,
inclusive, 9-404a to 9-404c, inclusive, 9-409, 9-410, 9-412, 9-436, 9-436a,
9-453e to 9-453h, inclusive, 9-453k or 9-453o, (B) two thousand dollars
per offense against any town clerk, registrar of voters, an appointee or
designee of a town clerk or registrar of voters, or any other election or
primary official whom the commission finds to have failed to discharge
a duty imposed by any provision of chapter 146 or 147, (C) two
thousand dollars per offense against any person the commission finds
to have (i) improperly voted in any election, primary or referendum,
and (ii) not been legally qualified to vote in such election, primary or
referendum, or (D) two thousand dollars per offense or twice the
amount of any improper payment or contribution, whichever is greater,
Public Act No. 26-1 122 of 123

Senate Bill No. 298
against any person the commission finds to be in violation of any
provision of chapter 155 or 157. The commission may levy a civil penalty
against any person under subparagraph (A), (B), (C) or (D) of this
subdivision only after giving the person an opportunity to be heard at a
hearing conducted in accordance with sections 4-176e to 4-184,
inclusive. In the case of failure to pay any such penalty levied pursuant
to this subsection within thirty days of written notice sent by certified
or registered mail to such person, the superior court for the judicial
district of Hartford, on application of the commission, may issue an
order requiring such person to pay the penalty imposed and such court
costs, state marshal's fees and attorney's fees incurred by the
commission as the court may determine. Any civil penalties paid,
collected or recovered under subparagraph (D) of this subdivision for a
violation of any provision of chapter 155 applying to the office of the
Treasurer shall be deposited on a pro rata basis in any trust funds, as
defined in section 3-13c, affected by such violation.
Sec. 98. Section 10-234gg of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
from passage)
Governor's Action:
Approved March 3, 2026
Line Item Vetoed by the Governor: Sections 5(a), 6, 7, 11, 12, and 13
Public Act No. 26-1 123 of 123